However, aprotinin showed a positive effect on some coagulation parameters in the reperfusion phase.
The mechanism appeared to be inhibition of the contact activation of the intrinsic system with less thrombin generation in the study group.
Co-existing inflammation and epidermal hyperproliferation characteristic for psoriasis have been shown to be reproducible in several animal models utilizing a variety of different strategies.These models highlight some points of the multicausal pathogenesis of psoriasis.
Based on observations made in the animal models, a hypothesis is proposed for the pathogenesis of psoriasis, the elements of which can be tested in a recently established xenogeneic transplantation model.
Adipose tissue tumors are often characterized by typical or even specific chromosomal alterations.
In some of the cases the molecular background of these microscopically visible alterations was already elucidated.
In myxoid liposarcomas the translocation t(12;16) creates a fusion gene between the CHOP gene and the FUS gene and in lipomas the HMGI-C gene becomes rearrranged by structural aberrations involving chromosomal region 12q14-15.
Based on examples of a lipoma, a well-differentiated liposarcoma, a myxoid liposarcoma, and an aggressive angiomyxoma it is demonstrated in the present paper how cytogenetic investigation can be used as an additional tool for an improved diagnosis of adipose tissue tumors.
Furthermore, the detection of molecular mechanisms underlying the visible cytogenetic alterations will certainly significantly increase our knowledge about the pathogenesis of these diseases.
The primary goal of diagnostic imaging of the larynx is analysis of submucosal structures that are not visible by clinical or endoscopic means.
Therefore, image analysis of the larynx should only be performed under knowledge of the results of clinical diagnosis.
The anatomic relationships of the laryngeal skeleton, the intrinsic structures, and the surrounding soft tissue are presented synoptically.
The pattern ERG (PERG) is used as an indicator of retinal ganglion cell function.
Up to now, reports on the reproducibility of the PERG have been contradictory.
We investigated the reproducibility under the conditions of the forthcoming ISCEV guidelines for the PERG.
We simultaneously recorded the PERG and VEP in 42 eyes of 21 subjects to phase-reversing checkerboard stimuli with DTL electrodes.
Both transient (2 rps) and steady-state (16 rps) stimulation was employed.
The check sizes were 0.4 °, 0.8 ° and 16 °, the mean luminance 45 cd/m2, the contrast 98%, and the field size 32 °x27 °.
Measurements were repeated at the same time of day after 1 week.
In addition, we compared two different electrode positions in 16 eyes: (1) across the cornea along the lower lid; and deep in the conjunctival sac.
With position (1) the amplitudes were found to be higher by 20% than (2).
We calculated the coefficient of variation (CV) of amplitude as a measure of reproducibility.
CV was 7 +/- 1% for the steady-state PERG, 9 +/- 1% for the transient PERG, 12 +/- 2% for the steady-state VEP and 14 +/- 3% for the transient VEP.
For the latency of the PERG, the intersession CV was found to be 1.5%.
Amplitude reproducibility was somewhat higher under steady-state as compared to transient stimulation; we attribute this to the high noise rejection of the Fourier analysis.
Altogether, the amplitude reproducibility of the PERG is somewhat higher than that of the VEP.
As a result of physical violence to exposed regions of skin (beating, grabbing) it was possible to effect a mutual transfer of epithelial cells between probands.
The majority of these cells were corneocytes with a minimal incidence of nucleated stratum granulosum cells.
Punching onto foil-covered sandbags resulted in a comparable transfer of cells.
Punches afflicted to the upper arms resulted in a successful `perpetrator-victim' assignment via DNA typing.
The DNA did not only originate from the few nucleated cells but also from the corneocytes themselves, as positively confirmed by investigations of denucleated cell-suspensions.
The cell concentration achieved in model experiments, however, shows that the forensic value of such a sample is dependent on the presence of nucleated cells.
The results of this paper justify the requirement - (having weighed up the appropriate case-specific modalities) - that sampling by taking swabs of the skin regions in question must be carried out as soon as possible.
Ultrasound contrast media increase backscatter from blood thus improving the signal-to-noise-ratio.
Potential clinical applications of intravenous ultrasound contrast are reviewed.
Contrast enhancement of continous wave Doppler is indicated when the native recordings are noisy and no complete envelope of the Doppler spectrum is obtained.
In aortic stenosis several investigations showed good agreement between the gradient calculated from Doppler measurements and the results of cardiac catheterization.
In mitral insufficiency maximum area of the regurgitant jet is a widely used parameter for estimation of the severity of the regurgitation.
However, assessment of the maximum jet area may be not possible because poor acoustic windows.
Contrast enhancement provides complete display of the regurgitant jet in most of the patients.
The diagnostic confidence of the Doppler investigation is further improved by the recording of the pulmonary venous flow, which can be recorded in most of the patients following injection on contrast.
Therefore contrast enhanced transthoracic Doppler is an alternative to transesophageal Doppler investigation in patients with poor transthoracic windows.
Since 1993 a report card system for fractures of the neck of the femur has been established in the Department of External Quality Assurance of the Chamber of Physicians of Westphalia-Lippe.
Several indicators of good quality have changed significantly since then: conservative treatment decreased from 6.8 % in 1993 to 4.2 % in 1997, lethality decreased from 6.9 % to 5.4 %, average length of stay decreased from 30.9 days to 24.9 days, average length of stay before operation decreased from 2.6 to 2.1 days, the frequency of operations on weekends increased, complications in wound healing increased from 4.9 to 6.0 %, and cardiopulmonary complications decreased from 11.2 % to 7.8 %.
Between 1993 and 1997, 54.3 % were dismissed to go home; the percentage of patients sent to rehabilitation facilities after acute care rose from 8.3 % in 1993 to 20.1 % in 1997.
The most frequent and still increasing procedure was implantation of hemiprosthesis/bipolar prosthesis (from 38.8 % in 1993 to 41.0 % in 1997) followed by total hip replacement (decreasing from 37.4 % in 1993 to 34.2 % in 1997).
Operative treatment was performed in more than 90 % of all fractures in all counties of Westphalia-Lippe.
However, there was a wide and significant geographical variation in the choice between osteosynthesis and hip replacement: the percentage of hip replacements differed between 57 % and 82 % among different counties.
Average length of stay before the operative procedure for patients undergoing reduction and rigid internal fixation of the fracture is still too long (1.6 days in 1997).
The etiology of os odontoideum is still controversial.
In most patients, it is found by accident because of neurological symptoms and/or painful range of motion of the cervical spine.
Upon recognition of the os odontoideum, it is unknown whether or not immediate surgery is beneficial.
This is in contrast to an "unstable" os odontoideum, which could result in atlantoaxial instability or compression of the myelon.
In this study, we present the results of our treatment of four patients with an unstable os odontoideum.
In all four cases, a C1-2 fusion was performed (3 x Magerl/Seemann, 1 Gallie-Brooks).
Postoperatively, we found a complete regression of neurological symptoms in three patients and one was significantly improved.
The range of motion of the cervical spine was free of pain in all patients.
As a result, we strongly support immediate surgical treatment of an unstable os odontoideum in order to prevent severe and life-threatening neurological complications.
Several studies from anglo-american countries indicate that in non-psychiatric hospital departments mentally ill patients have a longer length of hospital stay than mentally well, while in Austria and Germany, until now, no studies concerning this question exist.
Therefore, we investigated the influence of psychiatric comorbidity on the length of stay in 608 patients of medical, surgical and gynecological departments in Vienna and Tyrol.
Based on the Clinical Interview Schedule, 28.1% of the patients in this sample suffered from psychiatric disorders.
The presence of psychiatric disorders, as well as type of hospital department (medical department), higher age, more previous non-psychiatric treatment periods, and more somatic diagnoses predicted a longer duration of inpatient treatment.
To avoid the influence of cofounding variables, psychiatric cases were matched with psychiatric non-cases.
The mentally ill group was treated for a markedly longer period as inpatients than the mentally well.
Patients with a diagnosis of dementia or of substance abuse showed a significantly increased length of stay, while we could not confirm this for other psychiatric diagnoses.
The development of new cardiopulmonary bypass technologies, special surgical instruments, as well as intrathoracic video systems facilitates mitral surgery via a small right thoracotomy.
Functional recovery after bilateral comminuted fractures of the humeral head with posterior dislocation is poor.
When reposition and internal fixation fail, the remaining alternatives are (hemi)arthroplasty and/or arthrodesis.
In a 50-year-old patient, we treated the dominant shoulder by arthrodesis; a Neer prosthesis was inserted at the other side.
Using this strategy, the advantages of both techniques were combined with an acceptable functional recovery, which ist especially important for young and active patients.
Commonly used regiments for gut decontamination after oral ingestion of toxic substances are induced emesis, gastric lavage and activated charcoal.
It was not until recently that the effectiveness of these procedures was studied systematically.
The results of these studies are presented and the side effects and complications of the different procedures are discussed.
Together with the German poison control centers, guidelines for gut decontamination in pediatric patients were developed, based on the official recommendations of the European Association of Poisons Centres and Clinical Toxicologists (EAPCCT) and the American Academy of Clinical Toxicology (AACT).
The methodology used to assess postoperative continence has a significant effect on the outcome of incontinence surgery.
Retrospective chart review studies consistently report higher success rates than patient questionnaire-based outcome analyses.
The purpose of this study was to evaluate the true long-term results of the Stamey bladder neck suspension procedure using an anonymous patient questionnaire.
Of 172 consecutive patients, 138 (80.2 %) returned a questionnaire on long-term continence, complications and subjective satisfaction with the operative result.
With a mean follow-up of 66 months, 65 of 130 evaluable patients (50.0 %) remained completely continent while 15 (11.5 %) never became continent and 50 (38.5 %) had recurrent incontinence 6-90 months postoperatively.
Almost two-thirds of the patients felt either cured or substantially improved more than 5 years after surgery.
Stamey bladder neck suspension leads to a persistently improved quality of life despite a considerable failure rate.
Our study demonstrates the advantages of patient questionnaires for outcome analyses and emphasizes the need for standardisation and validation to allow comparisons between the results of different incontinence procedure in the future.
Social work for the elderly in a demographical ageing society is not justified per se, but has to prove its utility under the altering social conditions of the changing age-structure.
In the field of practice, this has led to an increasing need for professional orientation and to searching for profiles of performance with greater attraction.
Pseudoaneurysms of the extracranial internal carotid artery (ICA) can be caused by external injury or may be due to spontaneous dissection.
Pseudoaneurysms bear an increased risk of arterio-arterial embolism.
Treatment of pseudoaneurysms is influenced by the location and the type of injury, associated injurys, collaterals to the ipsilateral hemisphere, neurological signs and symptoms, growth of the lesion and patient age.
Potential treatment regimen include conservative and medical approaches with anticoagulation and antiplatelet therapy, extra-intracranial bypass, resection of the pseudoaneurysm with vessel reconstruction, ligation or endovascular balloon occlusion of the ICA.
Pseudoaneurysms of the ICA adjacent to the scull base require a major surgical procedure.
If there are contraindications for vessel occlusion conservative or medical treatment used to be the only therapeutic alternatives.
We report the treatment of two patients with extracranial ICA pseudoaneurysms after blunt injury with stent placement (in one case combined with coil embolization) as a further treatment option.
Introduction: The combination of direct magnification mammography and computed radiography provides an improvement in spatial resolution of storage phosphor-based digital systems.
A clinical study comparing conventional and digital direct magnification mammograms was performed.
Methods: 100 survey mammograms in 1.5- or 1.7-fold magnification and 50 4-fold spot magnification views were obtained with a prototype direct magnification mammography system and a storage phosphor-based digital system.
An intraindividual comparison of these with previous conventional radiograms of the same patients was carried out.
Results: The diagnostic value of digital survey mammograms using the direct magnification technique is comparable to that of conventional radiograms of the breast, especially with regard to the identification of microcalcifications and lesions and the clinical consequences.
Spot magnification views performed with this combination of techniques allowed improvement in the evaluation of microcalcifications.
In 15 % of cases, diagnostic procedures were adjusted accordingly.
Conclusion: The combination of the direct magnification technique with digital storage phosphor radiography systems allows the performance of digital mammography by improving the overall spatial resolution.
The diagnostic value of digital direct magnification survey mammograms was comparable to that of conventional mammograms.
Digital 4-fold spot magnification views improved visualisation of the morphologic aspects of microcalcifications.
Warthin's tumour of the larynx is an unusual finding.
In present literature only four cases have been reported.
Only one case of a woman suffering from Warthin's tumour of the protid gland and the ipsilateral site of the larynx has been published.
A case of a 74-year-old woman with an Warthin's tumour of the right parotid gland and the left false cord is presented.
The theories about the development of Warthin's tumours are discussed.
In rheumatic diseases, radiation synovectomy is a reliable method.
Meanwhile, radiation synovectomy is an outpatient therapy.
In addition, combination with arthroscopic synovectomy is an increasing therapeutic modality.
In comparison to the hitherto inpatient modality, a greater lymphatic emigration of the radionuclide and, therefore, a higher radiation exposure is possible.
In 35 patients we found radionuclide emigration in 17 cases by whole body scintigraphy, resulting in a 50%-percentile with 68.27%-confidence interval of 1.8 (0.45-4.78)% of the injected yttrium-90-activity.
Comparison of 3 groups with the above mentioned therapy modalitites resulted in no statistical difference (p>0.05).
Because of the found radionuclide emigration, a radiation dose of 0.1 (0.05-0,18) mSv in women and 0.2 (0.1-0.38) mSv in men was calculated.
For lymph nodes, liver, spleen and whole body radiation doses of 619 (154-1644) mSv, 62 (15-165) mSv, 62 (15-165) mSv and 37 (9-99) mSv were calculated.
Gonadal radiation dose can be neglected and the morbidity rate for tumors bacause of the whole body radiation dose is low with a value of 0.4 per thousand.
Therefore, radiation synovectomy can be used unlimited by patients age and independent of the therapeutic modality.
The goal of surgery using a thoracoscopic approach for the anterior reconstruction of fractures of the thoracic and lumbar spine is the reduction of postoperative pain and morbidity.
Fusion of the injured segment was performed by partial corporectomy and the vertebral body reconstructed using a tricortical autogenous bone graft.
A plate and screw assembly was inserted to stabilize the surgical correction.
This technique was used between May 1996 on May 1998 in 100 patients with 103 fractures of the thoracic and lumbar spine.
Fractures from T4 to L3 were stabilized; most fractures occurred  at the thoracolumbar junction.
A monosegmental short fusion was given preference in 51 patients.
A dorsoventral approach was necessary in 68 patients on account  of the fracture type.
Comparing a group of 30 patients who had undergone an open procedure and a similar group treated under thoracoscopic assistance, we found a marked reduction of the postoperative need for analgesics and the duration of postoperative ventilation.
Pneumatic external counterpulsation operates by applying ECG-triggered diastolic pressure via cuffs to the vascular bed of the lower limbs.
Comparable with intra-aortic balloon pumping, PECP produces a diastolic augmentation combined with increase of mean arterial pressure and coronary perfusion.
American, Asian, and our own data demonstrated a reduction of angina pectoris through repeated use of PECP one or two hours daily for four to seven weeks.
Exercise testing and thallium scanning confirmed the clinical improvement.
PECP is a virtually riskfree treatment option in patients suffering from angina despite medical and interventionell treatment.
Opening of collaterals and collateral growth induced by external counterpulsation are discussed as the cause of clinical benefit.
Transrectal fine-needle aspiration biopsy (FNAB) of the prostate under digital control is a cheap and rapid method for diagnostic evaluation of palpable and non-palpable nodules, yielding high sensitivity (ca.
95%) and a low complication rate (<1%).
Its specificity amounts to >97%.
The scarcity of urologists trained in the FNAB method and of pathologists experienced in cytology of the prostate limit the clinical application so far.
Besides various forms of prostatitis, five different types of cancer can cytologically be differentiated.
While PIN I cannot be cytologically identified, PIN II/III lesions may lead to false-positive diagnoses.
Cytologic grading of adenocarcinomas of the prostate is of statistically proven prognostic validity and strictly correlated with its histologic counterpart.
Preoperative, radiologically controlled FNAB of pelvic and paraortal lymph nodes has sensitivity of ca.
86% and specificity of 100%.
It thus helps to avoid unnecessary prostatectomies if nodal tumor spread has preoperatively been proven.
Diagnostic DNA cytometry is able to identify those prostatic cancer patients who do not reveal significantly increased risk of tumor progression or decreased survival probability, even without therapy (constantly and representatively diploid and tetraploid patterns).
Patients with DNA tetraplid histograms may show detoriation of prognosis under hormonal therapy.
DNA-aneuploid prostatic cancers should not be subjected to a "wait and see" strategy; they do not respond to hormonal therapy.
Early defibrillation is the standard of care for patients with ventricular fibrillation (VF) and pulseless ventricular tachycardia (VT).
Technical developments aim at further miniaturization and simplification of defibrillators as well as adaptation of energy requirements to the patient's needs.
Implantable Cardioverter-Defibrillators (ICD) and automated external defibrillators (AED) are based upon the same technology.
Both devices analyze the ECG signal internally, followed by a "shock" or "no shock" decision.
Use of automated devices is the prerequisite for defibrillation by non-physicians.
Chest impedance measurements and use of alternative shock waveforms, such as biphasic, aim at adaptation of energy or current to the patient's individual needs and avoid application of unnecessarily high amounts of energy to the myocardium.
Calculation of median frequency is a non-invasive method for analyzing the heart's metabolic and electrical state.
It helps to determine the optimal moment for defibrillation during cardiopulmonary resuscitation (CPR).
Developments concerning the structure of in-hospital emergency systems or pre-hospital emergency medical services (EMS) aim at further reductions in time from collapse of a patient until first defibrillation.
Such developments include early defibrillation programs for emergency medical technicians (EMT), nurses, and fire or police department first responders as well as wide distribution of easy-to-operate defibrillators in public areas, as discussed during the American Heart Association's Public Access Defibrillation conferences.
All programs of that kind have to be organized and supervised by a physician who is responsible for training and supervision of the personnel involved.
Spontaneous breathing with Biphasic Positive Airway Pressure (BIPAP) or Airway Pressure Release Ventilation (APRV) caused a reduction in intrapulmonary shunting and dead space ventilation and improvement in arterial oxygenation in patients with acute respiratory distress syndrome.
During spontaneous breathing with APRV/BIPAP venous return, cardiac output and oxygen delivery increased while oxygen consumption remained unchanged.
In patients early spontaneous breathing with APRV/BIPAP was associated with a better arterial oxygenation than in patients receiving controlled mechanical ventilation for 3 days and were then weaned with APRV/BIPAP.
Length of mechanical ventilation, intubation and ICU stay was shorter in patients breathing spontaneously early with APRV/BIPAP.
Therefore, early spontaneous breathing with APRV/BIPAP may be of advantage.
Rapid eye movement sleep behavior disorder (RBD) is a rare but clinically distinct disorder which is easily overlooked.
It commonly occurs in older men and, because of its similarity to epileptic seizures, is often misdiagnosed.
The etiology of RBD is still unknown.
However, there is an interesting association with Parkinson's disease which presents some pathophysiological hypotheses.
Treatment is usually successful with clonazepam.
Various therapeutic options have been proposed in the treatment of femoral head necrosis ranging from conservative management to total hip arthroplasty.
Since microsurgical techniques are routinely used in orthopaedic surgery, the importance of revascularization has increased in recent years.
Vascularized bone grafting as well as various osteotomies have been considered for the stages II and III according to Ficat and II, III and IV of the criteria of the ARCO system respectively, which also bases on MRI-findings.
We investigated the results of 80 patients with avascular necrosis of the femoral head treated with a vascular pedicled iliac bone graft, perfused by the A. circumflexa ilium profunda, between 1988 and 1996.
Mean follow-up was 5,6 years.
The evaluation was based on the harris hip score, clinical and radiological examination as well as a subjective assessment using a VAS (visual analog scale).
The clinical results according to the harris hip score were good or excellent in 86,1 %.
These results correlate with the subjective assessment of pain and of the hip joint function with an average of 7,9 points using the VAS (max.
Unchanged radiological appearance over the follow-up period was observed in 47,5 % using the ARCO criterias.
Reviewing the studies using vascularized grafts, about 50 % of the patients with a stage II and III according to Ficat and II, III and IV of the ARCO respectively show an unchanged stage of the disease 5-6 years after the procedure.
Therefore, transplantation of a vascular pedicled iliac bone graft possibly offers the chance to intervene causally in the course of the disease with only little alteration of the biomechanics of the hip joint.
This paper describes preprosthetic surgery from its historical beginnings to its present state-of-the-art status.
Future perspectives of preprosthetic surgery are also outlined, excluding implants.
In an enquiry of 250 German-speaking maxillofacial departments, 160 responded.
Results showed that a surprising 30-50% of the institutions are still following guidelines for procedures which have been proven by scientific follow-up studies to be almost 100% unsuccessful.
This paper summarizes the results of an attempt to reconstruct the fates of Jewish pediatricians from Germany, Vienna and the German Pediatric Hospitals in Prague between 1933 and 1945.
The relevant archives in Europe, USA, Great Britain and Israel provided facts and relevant dates for 697 Jewish pediatricians who were humiliated and murdered or who emigrated.
Compared with the total number of 1361 pediatric specialists in the three areas, more than 50% of them were Jews as defined by the Nazi racial laws.
So far, 577 cases have been cleared up: 446 of them emigrated to 31 countries; 63 became victims of the Holocaust; other individual destinies included going underground or committing suicide.
The fate of about 120 persons is still unknown.
This paper discusses the probable reasons for the high percentage of Jews in pediatrics, the anti-semitic attitude of the German Society for Pediatrics and the continual humiliation and persecution of Jewish pediatricians in the Nazi period.
We performed a prospective multi-center study in order to determine the causes of  30-day perioperative mortality.
The implantation of a mesh is an essential step in laparoscopic inguinal hernia surgery.
We present the case of a 22-year-old man who developed an unspecific and refractory syndrome of inguinal pain after a TAPP procedure for a primary inguinal hernia.
Repeated reoperation for removement of clips and nerve transection were unsuccessful.
By a transinguinal approach, 18 months after the first operation we removed a preperitoneal Prolene mesh which had shrunk and folded to 30 % of its original size.
The problem of biocompatibility of meshes currently used in inguinal hernia surgery is discussed.
Therapy of advanced renal cell carcinoma remains difficult.
New therapeutic schemes besides cytokine treatment should be evaluated.
The following study analyzes the in vitro toxicity of treosulfan on spheroids of 8 primary cultures of renal cell carcinoma cells.
These data were compared to the toxicity of vinblastine.
All investigations were performed in regard to the P-glycoprotein (Pgp) expression of the cells, which is one of the main causes of multidrug resistance.
Four Pgp positive and four Pgp negative spheroids were incubated with the drugs in increasing doses.
Toxicity was measured using the MTT toxicity assay as well as trypan blue exclusion.
Significantly higher toxicity of treosulfan compared to vinblastine could be demonstrated.
In addition, the effects of treosulfan were not related to Pgp expression.
These results are encouraging and a phase II study analyzing the efficacy of treosulfan in patients with advanced renal cell carcinoma has been initiated in our institution.
Postmenopausal hormone replacement therapy renders beneficial effects on cardiovascular risk factors such as blood lipids.
Additionally, direct protective mechanisms of estrogens in the blood vessels and myocardium are under study.
Recent findings suggest an improvement in endothelium-dependent vasodilatation and coronary microcirculation.
Furthermore, it has also been suggested that this treatment has cardioprotective effects on the left ventricular geometry, i.e., nomial left ventricular mass and wall thickness.
Whether the beneficial effects of estrogens are counterregulated by a combined use with progestins is not yet known and requires further investigation.
Malaria is one of the most common infectious diseases worldwide.
Characteristic signs of malaria are special macroscopic and microscopic organ changes, which may also be seen in postmortem examinations.
Modern diagnostic tools allow a fast and reliable diagnosis.
The symptoms of malaria are rather unspecific, so the correct diagnosis may be difficult, especially if the doctor is not informed about the patient having been abroad.
The cases presented also point out possible legal consequences of a missed diagnosis.
Prognostically relevant factors based on the histological assessment of the resected pancreas are known.
However, additional parameters, such as biological staging of the intrinsic malignant potentiality of the tumor, would be useful.
There has been no uniform finding of a relationship between CD44 variant expression and tumor progression.
Method: We assessed the expression pattern and prognostic impact of CD44 standard and CD44 isoforms v4, v5, v6, v7 and v10 in 40 ductal pancreatic carcinomas by immunochemistry on paraffin-embedded tumor material in patients after tumor resection.
At the time of the investigation neither histomorphological parameters nor the survival time were known.
Results: There was no correlation between the histomorphological parameter and the expression of CD44 splice variants.
CD44 splice variants v4-v10 were almost only expressed in tumor tissue.
In ductal pancreatic carcinoma, patients with an overexpression of CD44 splice variants had a worse prognosis.
However, because of the small number of cases this was statistically not significant.
Conclusion: CD44 splice variants may have an influence on prognosis in ductal pancreatic carcinoma.
However, further investigation on a larger number of patients is necessary to confirm these results.
Regarding the etiology of thoracic outlet syndrome (TOS), congenital bone and/or fibromuscular anomalies, positional characteristics and trauma play a role.
Signs and symptoms are extremely variable, depending on whether the compression of the plexus, of the artery or of the vein is predominant.
In the clinical examination the AEST test is of utmost importance.
The visualization of the subclavian artery and vein by DAS in different positions is mandatory.
Less than 5% of the patients show a subclavian artery aneurysm, but 76% have obstructions of digital arteries.
Every patient, must undergo a neurological examination including the measuring of the proximal ulnar and median nerve conduction times.
Anatomical lesions of the subclavian artery, reduction of the proximal nerve conduction times and high-degree venous compression as well as disabling pain during the night with abuse of analgesics are absolute indications for the decompression of the neurovascular bundle.
This is achieved by the transaxillary exarticulation of the first rib together with a cervical rib and fibromuscular bands if present.
The results of the primary operation are favourable: completely painfree 85%, markedly improved 12%, unchanged or worse 3%.
The results of operations for persisting and recurrent TOS are disappointing: completely painfree 48%, markedly improved 31%, but 21% unchanged or worse.
Regional perfusion of the lung is not distributed homogeneously within the organ.
This phenomenon has been explained by the classical concept of West et al.
based on the isolated canine lung.
The concept stresses the importance of different gravitational forces along the vertical axis of the lung resulting in three zones in which no pulmonary perfusion (zone 1), waterfall-like perfusion (zone 2), and continuous blood flow (zone 3) prevail.
In this article, we review recent publications in which observations have been made which cannot be explained by the West model.
A new concept of distribution of regional pulmonary perfusion is presented which centers on vascular factors which are better suited to account for observed blood flow heterogeneities.
The pulmonary vasculature is composed of repetitions of one structural unit: the vessel bifurcation.
Apart from its size, each single bifurcation is similar to all others.
The pulmonary vessel tree can, therefore, be considered to be self-similar.
Self-similarity has been identified as a design principle of living nature.
Self-similar objects can produce heterogeneity which is also self-similar when viewed at different scales of magnification.
For measurement of the structure of such objects and their function, i.e., in this case the heterogeneity of pulmonary perfusion, fractal geometry is best suited.
Distribution of blood flow within the lung can be described by means of fractal analysis, and all phenomena of perfusion distribution can easily be explained when applying this concept.
Furthermore, since the basis of fractal analysis is pulmonary vascular anatomy, it lends itself for the study of blood flow distribution.
A major advantage is the independence of fractal parameters from resolution of perfusion measurements.
Thus, fractal analysis can be used to compare results that have been obtained using different resolutions and different species.
Fractal methods have previously been used in medicine for other purposes.
Nonlinear analyses of heart beat variability can predict the onset of malign cardiac dysrhythmias hours before actual appearance in the ECG.
Very similar methods applied to electrical brain activity have been shown to allow prediction of epileptical seizures approximately 15 min prior to appearance of clinical symptoms.
In part I of the paper the biomechanical and technical background of the EPTT using the MPT fixator and the indications for this procedure have been described.
In part II we report about the clinical application of the EPTT in 67 patients with a wide spectrum of repairs and reconstructions of the extensor mechanism.
48 patients had fresh injuries, 18 of them with severe concomitant knee lesions and 19 patients had neglected rsp.
There were 4 deep infections, two of them related to the MPT fixator.
In the patients with uneventful healing the fixator remained in place for 7.3 weeks in average.
The clinical, isokinetic and radiological results were reviewed in 17 patients with an average follow-up time of 37.3 months.
There were 5 patients with partial patellectomy and tendon reattachment because of lower patella pole comminution and 12 patients with tendon reattachment ruptured at the inferior patella pole or suture repair in midsubstance rupture.
The clinical results according to the IKDC score were rated in 3 patients as normal, in 10 patients as nearly normal and in 4 patients as abnormal.
This rating was highly dependend on the subjective judgement by the patients who considered their operated knees not as normal as the contralateral knees.
From our clinical experiences and results we can derive that the EPTT enables the surgical management of extensor mechanism disruptions with a minimum of internal fixation material and provides a safe protection of the repairs and reconstructions during the healing period.
The EPTT allows immediate unrestricted functional rehabilitation and early walking without crutches.
Thus the EPTT represents an effective alternative to the patello-tibial cerclage with a wire or synthetic ligaments.
Ondansetron is more effective than a placebo in treating postoperative nausea and vomiting (PONV), but it has not been proved to be superior to established antiemetics for prophylaxis or therapy.
We compared ondansetron vs droperidol for the treatment of PONV.
Our prospective, randomized double-blind study was performed between 15 October 1992 and July 1993; it included 271 gynaecological ASA I - III inpatients who had been operated on under general anaesthesia with intubation.
Patients were excluded if: there was no informed consent; it was an ambulatory or emergency operation; the patient was pregnant or breast feeding; allergies were being treated with antihistamines; drug addiction was present or convulsions or Parkinson's disease; any pre- or intraoperative antiemetic medication had been administered.
All patients wishing an antiemetic and/or suffering from at least one emetic episode during the first 24 h postoperatively received either 8 mg ondansetron or 1.25 mg droperidol from identical 4 ml ampoules intravenously.
The verbal nausea score (1=none, 2=mild, 3=moderate, 4=severe) was recorded every 30 min for 4 h, then before and 2 h after each antiemetic dose.
All emetic episodes and the interval between administration and effect were also noted.
Patients were interviewed 36 - 48 h postoperatively on subjective effects, side-effects and individual acceptance.
After oral premedication with diazepam, anaesthesia was induced with thiopental, in a few cases with etomidate or propofol.
Relaxation was achieved with pancuronium or atracurium and, when indicated, with succinylcholine.
Muscular relaxation was antagonized with neostigmin and glycopyrrolate.
Gastric content was aspirated once after intubation.
Anaesthesia was maintained with nitrous oxide/oxygen, enflurane, halothane or isoflurane and fentanyl up to 0.3 mg. Statistical evaluation was performed by the unpaired Student's t-test and the Mann-Whitney U test.
Categoric variables were examined by the 2 test.
Significance was defined as P<0.05.
Of 271 patients, 100 (37%) experienced PONV.
The groups were statistically comparable with respect to demographic data, type and duration of operation, emesis record, perioperative uterotonic medication.
Twenty patients in the ondansetron group and 27 in the droperidol group received the first antiemetic within 2 h, the other patients up to 17 h after extubation.
Nausea scores and emetic episodes were identical before antiemetic medication.
The reduction of these parameters after medication was similar.
Complete response over 6 h was 60% in the ondansetron and 68% in the droperidol group.
In both groups the first medication failed in 4 cases during the initial 2 h. Twenty of the ondansetron and 16 of the droperidol patients needed a second dose; among these 2 and 4, respectively, a third ampoule.
No rescue medication was necessary over 24 h and a mean of 1.4 ampoules was administered in both groups.
Onset and quality of emetic action were identical in both groups.
It was not possible to evaluate 25 interviews due to linguistic or amnestic problems.
Multiple side-effects were noted frequently.
Injection pain was reported significantly more often in the droperidol, pruritus in the ondansetron group.
Ninety-three percent of the ondansetron and 85% of the droperidol patients opted for the same drug for future PONV treatment.
Ondansetron (8 mg) and droperidol (1.25 mg) proved to be equally effective when used as a postoperative antiemetic.
Both drugs showed similar side-effects.
Due to differences in methods it was difficult to compare our results to those obtained in other studies.
Paradoxical embolism is well-known in theory but rarely encountered in clinical practice.
The typical pathophysiological background is the coincidence of venous thrombosis, elevated right atrial pressure, and a consecutive right-to-left shunting via a patent foramen ovale or an atrial septal defect.
This review summarizes the results of internal cardioversion of atrial fibrillation in comparison to external cardioversion.
Internal cardioversion was achieved by positioning defibrillation electrodes in the right atrium and coronary sinus (alternatively in the left pulmonary artery).
In previous studies also a combined internal/external cardioversion was used by locating a defibrillation electrode in the right atrium together with a cutaneous patch electrode.
Although in comparative studies the success rate of 91-93% with internal cardioversion is higher compared to success rates of 67-79% with external cardioversion, the conventional method of external cardioversion remains the method of first choice.
The success rate of internal cardioversion after failed external cardioversion ranges from 73 to over 90%.
Possible indications for primary internal cardioversion are: induced atrial fibrillation during electrophysiological studies, atrial fibrillation after cardiothoracic surgery and cardioversion of atrial fibrillation in patients with permanent pacemaker implants.
Objective: The objective of the study is to evaluate the importance of home care for patients with advanced tumor diseases and for their families.
VDD single-lead systems use floating ring electrodes for atrial sensing.
To ensure an optimal atrial sensing function, knowledge of the interactions between electrode design, pacemaker, amplifier and implantation technique is required.
In this overview, technical determinants of atrial sensing concerning atrial ring configuration (surface area, ring spacing, full/half ring), design of the lead (insulation material, conductor coil configuration), and amplifier design (differential amplifier, sensing impedance, bandpass filter) shall be explained and related to determinants at implant (AV distance, site of implantation, atrial position, intraoperative measurement technique).
(1) Ring configuration: Bipolar atrial full ring systems have proved to be efficient with narrow (5-10mm) or wide (15-30mm) ring spacing, as well as bipolar half ring systems with DAB configuration and narrow ring spacing.
Especially in a position close to the atrial wall, a wide ring spacing detects a less clear-cut signal than a short ring spacing; on the other hand, with a wide ring spacing, sensing is less compromised if the rings move to a worse position further away from the wall.
A narrow ring spacing detects a sharper signal if positioned close to the atrial wall, but a considerable reduction of sensed P wave amplitude may result if it moves away from the wall or to an oblique angle relative to the atrial depolarization front.
(2) Design of the lead: Polyurethane as insulation material provides a higher stiffness than silicone insulation.
A coaxial conductor configuration increases stiffness and consequently the possibility to manipulate the atrial part of the lead.
Thus, if a position close to the atrial wall is desired, the combination of a coaxial conductor coil, polyurethane insulation, and a narrow ring spacing seems most promising.
(3) Amplifier design: For atrial sensing in VDD systems, bipolar sensing, differential amplifier, high sensing impedance (>=2k), and a wide bandpass filter (e.g., 10-100Hz) should be realized.
Especially the inclusion of a relatively low frequency range (10-40Hz) is important, because compared to a fixed atrial electrode, a higher quantity of the atrial signal sensed by a floating electrode is in the low-frequency range.
(4) Implantation: To choose the best fitting electrode, a preoperative assessment of the size of the right cardiac cavities should be performed.
A position of the ring electrodes in the mid-to-high right atrium parallel to the lateral wall should be the goal.
Correct interpretation of the sensed P wave amplitude and prediction of sufficient sensing after connection with the pacemaker is only possible with exact knowledge of the measurement technique of the intraoperative pacing system analyzer and the connected permanent pacemaker device (bandpass filter, signal peak-to baseline or peak-to-peak).
Attention should be paid to the fixation of the electrode at the site of insertion to avoid postoperative dislocation of the ring electrodes.
Knowledge of different electrode/pacemaker specific parameters and special aspects at implantation is a prerequisite for optimal function of VDD single-lead systems.
Preoperatively, considerations should concern the choice of the electrode (AV distance, ring spacing) and implantation strategy (position close to or rather apart from the atrial wall).
An atrial position may only be accepted if sufficient sensing can be documented with a measuring method similar to that of the implanted pacemaker.
Objectives: To investigate the agreement (and its potential dependency on extravascular lung water) between transpulmonary (TPID) and standard pulmonary artery (PAID) thermodilution cardiac output  measurements.
In the industrial Western world, 8 % of the population suffer from urogenital discomfort.
Epidemiologic studies show that the incidence rises with age.
In light of the steadily increasing longevity in the female population, clinically manifested irregularities such as urogenital atrophy, recurrent urinary tract infections, irritable bladder, and incontinence pose a challenge to the attending physician.
To this day, urinary incontinence in later life is considered "normal" and "caused by old age."
However, among other age-related reasons, the main cause of this disorder is postmenopausal hormone deficiency.
Thus, following thorough diagnostics, pathological changes in the urogenital tract can often be reduced or altogether eliminated by simple conservative measures such as topical hormone administration, which rapidly enhance patients' quality of life.
The present study gives an overview of the physiology of urogenital aging and the diagnostic and therapeutic means available to physicians to alleviate patients' discomfort.
Recurrent abdominal pain (RAP) is one of the most common pain syndromes in childhood, with prevalence rates ranging from 10 to 20% in all school-age children.
In nearly 50% the complaints persist over many years of their life-span to adolescence or adulthood.
Although the empirical findings have increased in the last decade, our knowledge about the etiology, pathogenesis, and pathophysiology is still very limited.
Current approaches suggest that we understand recurrent pain syndromes as a complex and multidimensional disturbance (biopsychosocial paradigm).
In this respect there is strong evidence for the major importance of psychosocial causes (daily hassles, specific life events), psychopathological factors (anxiety, depression, somatization disorder), and social environmental influences (mother's psychopathology, social modelling, reinforcement) in the pathogenesis of functional abdominal pain.
The noticeable correlation with other pain syndromes and functional disturbances indicates that recurrent pain may possibly be a manifestation of a basic somatization disorder.
The unfavourable long-term prognosis supports the need for early and specific interventions.
Psychological treatment requires a medical examination to exclude organic origins.
Some of these invasive diagnostic procedures can be very difficult, expensive and distressing for the child.
Behavioural medicine is based upon having an extensive family history and symptom analysis.
The psychological interventions applied in clinical practice include prophylaxis, reduction of pain symptoms and environmental modification.
In recent years there has been an increasing trend to create more complex and multidimensional behavioural treatment programs for children.
Although preliminary data on the use of these behavioural medicine programs have shown some promise, further investigations are needed to examine the applicability and effectiveness of specific interventions in the treatment of abdominal pain symptoms.
Dermatologic disorders of the stump in patients with a leg amputation may have characteristic pathophysiologic and clinical features.
A knowledge of these factors may lead to earlier diagnosis and avoid immobilization.
There ist no German language review of this aspect of dermatology.
After providing an overview of the problem, including a discussion of prostheses, we review the following problems: mechanically induced blisters, follicular keratoses, epidermoid cysts, stump edema syndrome, acroangiodermatitis (pseudo-kaposi sarcoma) and verrucous hyperplasia.
Secondary aortoenteric fistulas are a well-known complication after open repair of an abdominal aortic aneurysm.
This is the first case description of an aortoenteric fistula after endoluminal treatment of an abdominal aortic aneurysm.
Preoperative diagnosis by antigranulocyte immunscintigraphy established infection of the protheses.
The problem was solved by closing the defect of duodenum, removing the endoprotheses and in situ reconstruction with omentumplasty.
The reasons and consequences are discussed.
Concepts in the treatment of craniomaxillofacial fractures have changed over the last 15 years.
Modern imaging techniques have become a central part in establishing a proper diagnosis.
Advanced life support and intensive care medicine allow for early primary fracture treatment.
The former principles of minimal exposure of bone fragments using small incisions have been replaced by principles from reconstructive craniofacial surgery comprising extensive subperiosteal dissection, exposure of all fracture lines, open reduction and rigid internal fixation.
Missing bony structures are replaced primarily by autogenous bone grafts.
Using these concepts, most late esthetic and functional sequelae of facial fractures can be diminished remarkably.
In a 20-year period (1974-1993), 4230 patients underwent surgery of the gallbladder.
Acute cholecystitis was the indication for emergency laparotomy in 869 patients (20,5 %).
Retrospective analysis demonstrated that after adjustment for age, sex, and mode of surgery - elective versus emergency - advanced age is not a risk factor contributing to mortality in uncomplicated cases of emergency surgery.
Cases of acute cholecystitis complicated by perforation, peritonitis, and/or the presence of concrements in the biliary duct are associated with an increased mortality, however.
We were able to demonstrate that advanced age is a risk factor in complicated cases and contributes to increased post-surgical mortality.
The clinical effect of ionidizing radiation on ocular neovascularizations is controversial not only because of the variety of treatment modalities.
The aim of our study was to investigate an experimental model which allows to evaluate radiation parameters and to study the mechanism of the inhibitory effect on neoangiogenesis.
We report on a 59-year-old woman patient with selective IgA deficiency and familial hypercholesterinaemia.
To lower elevated LDL levels in the patient's blood, immunoadsorption therapy with sheep-anti-human polyclonal antibodies coupled to sepharose columns was administered.
During the procedure, the patient developed an anaphylactic shock requiring intensive care treatment.
The patient's history revealed a fresh cell therapy with fetal sheep cells 10 years previously.
Intracutaneous testing confirmed sensitization to sheep immunoglobulin, which was the most likely reason for the anaphylactic shock.
A nationwide survey was performed to evaluate the significance of knee replacement (endoprosthesis) in Germany.
All orthopaedic, traumatologic and general surgeons were asked about their preferred surgical techniques, favourite types of prosthesis and related issues.
Sledge prostheses have been increasingly preferred to constrained prostheses in the last few years.
Unicompartmental prostheses as well as constrained prostheses and high tibial osteotomies are still chosen for special cases.
Revisions were most commonly due to patella problems.
Patella replacement is popular to prevent this problem.
Endoprosthetic knee surgery receives as much endorsement among German surgeons as endoprosthetic hip surgery.
An important problem is the increasing costs of the method.
Chronic pulmonary hypertension and septic lung failure display different clinical features resulting in severe disturbances in the pulmonary circulation.
In these diseases, the pulmonary bloodflow is impaired by a pathologic constriction of blood vessels that may lead to right ventricular overloading as well as serious worsening of gas exchange mainly caused by ventilation/perfusion mismatch.
Various mechanisms deteriorating the vascular function may induce both an irreversible and a reversible contraction of pulmonary vessels, respectively.
Two pharmacological approaches exist to reduce the vascular resistance:...
Objective: to examine mortality, mobility, pain, institutionalization rates six month after hip fractures.
Lateral acetabular osteotomy in comparison to three-dimensional osteotomies of the pelvis in hip dysplasia is a simple technical procedure.
Contraindications are an age over 8 years and an irreducible femoral head.
For a long time we have used xenogenic deproteinized bone wedges from animals.
We now use autoclaved and deep-frozen wedges from allogenic femoral heads.
The wedges are sterilized at 121  °C for 20 min and then kept deep-frozen in the bone bank.
Our results in 109 patients show that this method is very successful; even extreme angles of acetabular index correction are possible with this technique.
It is unfortunate that the lateral acetabuloplasty with autoclaved allogenic bone graft is not used frequently and we recommend that this method be installed at all paediatric orthopaedic hospitals.
There are only few publications about the effect of music therapy on pain relief.
The intention of this prospective study is to demonstrate the influence of the Nordoff/Robbins method of active music therapy in a group of 12 patients with fibromyalgia, myofascial pain syndromes and polyarthritis on pain reduction, life quality and coping.
The clinical parameters of each patient were related to the observations in the audio- and video-documented music therapy settings and to the self-reported changes in pain intensity and pain behaviour.
There was a significant reduction of pain intensity and pain-related disability in the music group compared to a control group, but no change in the depression and anxiety score.
The influence of music therapy could be even better demonstrated in the systematic analysis of the single cases by individual profiles.
Active music therapy affects especially the communicative and emotional dimension of chronic pain.
Psychophysiological and psychodynamic models are presented to explain the effectiveness of music therapy on pain reduction.
Clinical studies on music therapy as well as on other "art therapies" should relate the analysis of clinical parameters to the descriptive-phenomenological documentation of the therapeutic process to demonstrate systematically the influence of music and art in the individual case.
Background: Retrospective analysis to  assess the value of the sequential arginine-insulin-test (SAIT) in the diagnosis of growth hormone deficiency (GHD).
Case Report: The case of a 57-year-old woman is reported who was admitted for peripheral hypereosinophilia.
Auditory similarities in voices of monozygotic twins have already been described in the literature.
However, is there a clinical relevance?
Thus, the present study was designed to identify parameters of vocal performance and acoustic features which are significantly more similar in monozygotic twins than in non-related persons.
In our hypothesis, comparable prerequisites for an increased vocal load in a profession or in an artistic education of the voice could be due to these similarities.
We compared intra-pair differences with data from a control group.
Moreover, we examined the correlation of intra-pair differences with the age of the monozygotic twins.
A greater difference in older twin pairs than in younger pairs could show the effect of an exogene influence.
In addition to the few phoniatric studies in twins in the literature, we used current methods for acoustic analysis.
We examined seven parameters of vocal performance and three acoustic features in 31 monozygotic twin pairs (median age 36 years, range 18-75 years) and compared them with 30 control group pairs, which consisted of non-related persons of the same age and sex, newly combined from the group of monozygotic twins ("statistical twins").
We found significant differences in seven of ten parameters (vocal range, highest and lowest vocal fundamental frequency, fundamental speaking frequency, maximum voice intensity, number of partials, vibrato of intensity; U-test by Mann-Whitney).
No correlation of the differences of the identical twins with age was found in the examined parameters.
The voices of identical twins are significantly more similar than those of non-related persons regarding the above mentioned features.
Thus, the suitability of the voices of monozygotic twins for professions with a high demand on voice is comparable.
Results of the group comparison correlate largely with the literature.
The missing correlation with age could be due to the fact that the environmental effects were not measurable, and/or the development of the voice is more influenced by genetic effects.
After > 10 000 treatments - our HM3/4 and MPL 9000 have been replaced by the Siemens Lithostar multiline.
As a ESWL center with ESWL as the primary treatment indication for all types of stones in kidney and ureter we report our initial experience with this new multifunctional lithotripter.
The system consists of an electromagnetic shock-wave emitter (Focus 80 x 5 mm) and a digital fluoroscopy unit.
Stone localization is achieved in a - 10 ° and + 30  ° position without movement of the patient.
The treatment table itself allows most endourologic and percutaneous auxiliary procedures.
Additionally, an intergrated inline ultrasound is available.
From 10/94 to 08/95, 204 male and 96 female patients with a mean age of 50.7 (4-92) years underwent ESWL with the Lithostar multiline.
The mean stone diameter was 10.3 (2-20) mm with 53 % ureteral and 47 % renal stones.
300 patients underwent 480 treatments (average shocks 3673, range 793-8000; mean energy level 5.5, range 1-9).
Stone localization was achieved after 5 (1-39) min (mean fluoroscopy time 3.1 (0.5-16.2) min).
In 92.7 % no analgesic premedication was done.
56 % of the patients needed no analgesics at all during ESWL.
44 % received 8.1 (2-15) mg Piritramid intravenously.
Epidural anesthesia was performed in only 2.3 % for a second treatment.
95 % of the patients had complete stone disintegration.
In 68 % disintegration was achieved in one session.
ESWL was repeated for further disintegration in 18.5 %, because of an unsuccessful treatment in 11.5 % and because of technical interruption of the previous session in 2.5 %.
We saw subkapsular haematomas in 2 %.
Auxiliary procedures following ESWL were necessary in only 9.2 % of the patients.
In situ ESWL with the new Lithostar Multiline seems to be as effective as the Dornier HM3/4.
Analgesia-free treatment was performed in more than 50 % of the patients.
Auxiliary procedures were less frequently necessary as compared to our previous experience with in situ ESWL.
We report on a strikingly frequent referral of former preterm babies with respiratory syncytial virus (RSV) infection and subsequent ARDS in our hospital during the winter 1994/95 with regard to the clinical course under application of alternative treatment modalities.
Treatment modalities like inhalational ribavirin, use of bronchodilators and instillation of surfactant had been tried without success.
All children (age: 1-43 months) were ventilated for 6.6 (1-17) days with FiO2 = 1.0 and a mean airway pressure of 16.4 (10-24) cm H2O.
Mean arterial blood gases were 49 (paO2) and 41 (pCO2) mm Hg, the OI was 33.4.
By inhalational NO in combination with IPPV or HFOV 4 patients could be stabilized, in the other 6 ECMO became necessary.
Two of them died in spite of several weeks on ECMO; 8 children survived and could be discharged home after a mean hospital stay of 3 months.
Even in very severe cases of RSV infection treatment modalities like NO, HFOV and ECMO can be used successfully.
The use of these treatment modalities must be considered before the lung damage is irreversible; in those cases a pre-existing BPD is no contraindication even for extracorporeal lung support.
The vascular organization of human spermatic cord was analyzed by means of injection and by casting preparation of the testicular artery and veins of the pampiniform plexus after orchiectomy.
After leaving the human testis, the testicular veins are organized in two main groups and form two vein plexus.
One of these vein groups forms a tight plexus around the testicular artery.
Computer-aided 3-D reconstructions based on the paraffin serial sections of the human spermatic cord allowed us to demonstrate the relation between the blood vessels and the other tissue structures of the spermatic cord.
The results obtained allowed us to subdivide the human spermatic cord into three compartments.
The dorsomedial compartment contains the vas deferens and its blood vessels.
The middle compartment contains the testicular artery and the vein group which forms a tight plexus around this artery.
The ventrolateral compartment contains a vein group which shows no topographic relation to the testicular artery.
This vein group is embedded in a large, macroscopically visible volume of fatty tissue.
To be sure of sparing the testicular artery during antegrade sclerotherapy this vein group should be prepared.
It has known for a long time that Sydenham's chorea and tics, as seen in Gilles de la Tourette's syndrome (GTS), are phenomenologically very similar.
Tics may occur as symptoms of acute Sydenham's chorea or persist over years as residual symptoms.
Investigations of children suffering from GTS, including obsessive-compusilve symptoms, have provided signs of a poststreptococcal autoimmune process but also shown that treatment based on immunological interventions has been effective.
We treated a 14-year-old boy showing all diagnostic criteria of GTS, familial susceptibility, and an increase in the antibody titer of streptococcal antigens with 7S immunoglobulins i.v.
Response to this therapy was good regarding motor tics, vocal tics, and behavioral symptoms such as disturbed impulse control which still persisted after 9 months.
These findings and the successful therapy underline reports of the literature and point to a pathogenetic mechanism of an immunologically triggered disturbance of the striatal dopaminergic system, at least in a subgroup of GTS.
We report on three cases with chronic immune thrombocytopenic purpura (ITP) and insulin-dependent diabetes mellitus (IDDM) or prediabetes.
All three patients suffered from autoimmune polyglandular syndrome type II.
Among our patients with isolated IDDM (about 250 patients) no case of ITP was seen.
Therefore we recommend that all patients with chronic immune thrombocytopenic purpura and insulin-dependent diabetes mellitus should be carefully monitored for other diseases associated with autoimmune polyglandular syndrome type II.
The high rate of coronary artery disease (CAD) mortality needs preventive intervention.
Several studies have documented the effectiveness of LDL-cholesterol lowering in CAD primary prevention.
The West of Scotland Prevention Study resulted in risk reduction by about one third through LDL-cholesterol lowering.
The data indicate that specifically patients at high risk benefit from lipid reduction.
High risk patients have besides high LDL-cholesterol one or more additional risk factors such as family history of premature coronary artery disease, hypertension, smoking, low HDL-cholesterol or diabetes.
Therapy primarily aims at life style changes, secession of smoking and weight reduction as well as dietary changes to achieve LDL-cholesterol levels of 115-175 mg/dl (3-4.5 mmol/L), depending on the individual risk constellation.
This strategy allows to reduce the number of patients needed to treat in order to prevent one CAD event (56 in isolated hypercholesterolemia) to 14-24 in high risk persons, approaching the number (n=13) known for effective lipid lowering in secondary prevention of coronary heart disease.
One hundred and three cases of Spitz nevi were reviewed.
36% of these patients were adults.
The lesions in children occurred primarily on the face and secondarily on the trunk followed by the extremities.
In adults, they affect the legs in women, and the trunk in men as does malignant melanoma.
Clinically they were diagnosed more frequently as Spitz nevi in children and adolescents than in adults.
Spitz nevi were most commonly mistaken clinically for "common" melanocytic nevus, hemangioma, verruca, fibrous histiocytoma, molluscum contagiosum, granuloma pyogenicum, keloid, and melanoma.
Histologically, there are various expressions of Spitz nevi, but they are usually compound melanocytic nevi with little pigmentation and typically large spindle- and/or epithelioid melanocytes.
There are only small histopathological differences between Spitz nevi in childhood and adulthood: one important feature rarely seen in Spitz nevi of adults is multiple mitotic figures at the dermo-epidermal junction but rarely at the base of the melanocytic nevus.
Nevus Reed is considered to possibly be a distinctly pigmented variant of Spitz nevus.
A few months ago an endovascular implantable PTFE stent graft became commercially available.
Since May 1998 we have treated 15 patients with extensive vascular occlusion at the femoropopliteal level.
The implantation is carried out via a single inguinal approach in combination with conventional vascular surgical techniques like orthograde ringstripping of the superficial femoral artery, local TEA and patch-grafting of the femoral bifurcation, angioplasty, local lysis, etc.
The self-expanding thin-walled PTFE stent prothesis appears to be a viable alternative to the femoropopliteal P1 bypass and can be performed under local anesthesia, percutaneously or through a small inguinal incision.
The implantation can be carried out with minimal tissue trauma.
Radiological and orthopaedic outcome in severe and moderate haemophilia A and B patients undergoing long-term prophylactic treatment were prospectively investigated focusing on the age of onset of prophylaxis and the number of joint bleedings prior to treatment.
We report on 21 patients with severe and moderate haemophilia A and B receiving prophylactic treatment of between 3.1 and 16.1 years duration.
Three patient groups were evaluated according to the age at onset of prophylaxis.
In group I (n = 8) prophylactic treatment was initiated in the first 2 years of life.
Patients of group II (n = 6) received prophylaxis at the age of 3-6 years.
Late-onset or secondary prophylactic treatment was started at the age of 6 years and above in 7 patients (group III).
All patients received virus-inactivated F VIII or F IX concentrates at dosages of 30-40 IU, in some cases up to 50 IU/kg body weight i. v. three times per week for those with haemophilia A and twice per week for those with haemophilia B. Elbow, knee and ankle joints were investigated at 3-4 yearly intervals according to the radiological and orthopaedic scores recommended by the World Federation of Haemophilia (WFH).
The total number of joint bleedings before and after start of prophylaxis were recorded in all patients.
In group I 7 out of 8 patients had unaffected joints with constant radiological and orthopaedic scores of zero or 1, after a median of 11.25 years of prophylactic treatment.
One patient in this group demonstrated mild radiological alterations (score 4).
Patients of group II showed neither radiological nor orthopaedic alterations at study entry.
Worsening joint scores could be detected despite ongoing prophylaxis after the 3-year interval (median orthopaedic score 4, median radiological score 8).
Treatment group III already showed considerable joint damage at study entry with a median radiological score of 11 (0-33) and a median orthopaedic score of 4 (0-11).
Despite prophylactic treatment both, orthopaedic (median 8, range 2-12) and radiological scores (median 19.5, range 2-47) deteriorated after 3 years.
Prior to onset of prophylaxis no or only one joint bleeding occurred in treatment group I.
In group II, a median of 6 joint bleeds (range 1-8) were reported before prophylaxis was started.
Patients of group III usually experienced a median of more than 10 joint haemorrhages (range 6-10 or more).
Under prophylactic treatment the number of joint bleedings decreased significantly in groups II and III.
However, radiological and orthopaedic scores increased as a sign of progressing osteoarthropathic alterations in patients reporting more than 6 joint haemorrhages before onset of prophylaxis whereas no joint alterations could be assessed in patients with no or only one joint bleeding episode prior to prophylaxis.
Even a small number of joint bleedings seems to cause irreversible osteoarthropathic alterations leading to haemophilic arthropathy.
Once apparent, further progression of joint damage could not be arrested despite of prophylactic treatment (group II and III).
In order to prevent haemophilic arthropathy, effective prophylaxis should be started before or at least after the first joint bleeding in severe haemophilia A and B.
The hemodynamic treatment of septic shock consists of fluid repletion, maintenance of an adequate cardiac output, and restoration of mean arterial pressure.
Norepinephrine is a potent vasopressor that can be considered when the patient is adequately fluid resuscitated, when cardiac output is greater than 3.5 l/min/m2 (or Sv O2>=65%) and when blood pressure remains low.
The objective is to achieve and maintain a mean arterial pressure of 60-70 mmHg, or more in some patients (older or hypertensive patients).
Renal effects of norepinephrine were evaluated in several studies; urine output, creatinine clearance, and osmolar clearance are significantly increased.
Norepinephrine is perfectly suited in situations of high renal output and low renal resistance, as is the case in septic shock patients.
The effect on oxygen transport is unpredictable.
The effects on lactate concentrations were poorly evaluated, but several studies suggest that the drug does not worsen and can even improve tissue oxygenation of septic shock patients.
Provided that cardiac output is maintained, treatment with norepinephrine is without negative effects on splanchnic tissue oxygenation.
In conclusion, the clinical experience with norepinephrine strongly suggests that this drug can successfully increase blood pressure without deteriorating cardiac output and organ function.
Whether using norepinephrine in septic shock patients effects mortality as compared to dopamine or epinephrine still requires a prospective study.
Is it possible to find a correlation between the localisation of neovascularisations and the localisation and extension of the retinal ischemia?
Ischemia was recognized not as capillary non-perfusion but as impaired retinal perfusion.
Elderly patients with known episodes of atrial arrhythmia and indication to pacemaker therapy are borderline cases relative to selection of ventricular single-chamber or dual-chamber pacemaker.
The frequency of recurrence of arrhythmic episodes under dual-chamber pacemaker therapy is there the most important criterion.
The differences between patients prone to paroxysmal atrial tachyarrhythmia (atrial fibrillation or atrial flutter) and patients without atrial tachyarrhythmia in their medical history were investigated.
Frequency of recurrence of atrial fibrillation/flutter and the rate of successful therapy after implantation of a dual chamber pacemaker were studied.
The long-term history of 39 patients with known intermittent or durably successfully treated episodes of atrial fibrillation/flutter was compared with 24 patients with new atrial tachyarrhythmia after pacemaker implantation.
There was no significant difference in the frequency of recurrence and in therapy efficiency of atrial tachyarrhythmia between both groups.
The results show the benefit of implanting a dual chamber pacemaker also for patients with a known history of atrial tachyarrhythmia.
It therefore, should be postulated for therapy of those patients.
Although the risks and side effects of blood transfusions have been significantly reduced during the past years, the potential infectious and immunologic side effects still require a clear and restricted indication before each transfusion is performed.
However, the transfusion errors before and during administration of blood components nowadays represent the highest risk in particular for critical care and high risk patients.
This article focuses on the specific problems of handling, preparation, and practical performance of transfusions.
Some practical aspects and problems of transfusions are examplary shown for intensive care and high risk patients, such as immunosuppressed, transplanted or polytraumatic patients and critical care premature neonates.
Vincent's angina (Plaut-Vincent) is the most prominent disease caused by coinciding infections from fusibacteria and spirochaeta both belonging to obligate anaerobic bacterias.
A possible symbiotic infection of both anaerobics may become manifest on the mucous membranes of the oral cavity and the oropharynx beside the tonsillas.
The clinical outcome may be different and pose difficulties in the differential diagnosis.
We report the case of a 29 year old female patient with necrotizing ulcera of the soft palate suspicious for stomatitis ulceromembranacea.
In case necrotizing inflammations of the oral cavity area were to be found infections due to anaerobic bacterias should be considered mostly occuring as mixed infections.
The correct identification by cultivation turnes out to be difficult in that it requires special conditions.
Furthermore, reliable detection of these bacterias necessitates careful collection and transport of patients specimens.
In case of Fusospirochaetosis (Fusotreponematose) a specimen should be prepared for microscopic examination beside setting up a special culture.
This is because the staining is the most suitable procedure for bacteril identification to support the clinical diagnosis of stomatitis ulceromembranacea.
Quantitative tissue Doppler echocardiography is a new diagnostic approach to left ventricular systolic performance.
The aim of the present study was to validate a recently developed method based on the computer software TDI-Labor enabling a variable time and space related measurement of regional wall velocity from tissue Doppler images.
Therefore, in 63 volunteers the mean velocity of a 2 mm thick subendocardial slice during the systolic ejection period was determined from frozen Doppler M-mode images of the left ventricular posterior wall obtained using the left parasternal window.
The same images were employed for comparative measurement of the mean endocardial velocity using the conventional M-mode slope approach.
Tissue Doppler data of the subendocardial wall velocity were found to correspond closely to the mean endocardial wall velocity (y = 0.97x + 0.17; r = 0.77; p < 0.0001).
The average wall motion gradient of the population was 1.33  +/-  0.35.
Wall motion velocity and wall motion gradient were shown to be not age dependent.
Historically, the profession of geriatric nurse has arisen from the care of the sick and has developed very differently from region to region.
A question as to the status of development of the profession of geriatric nurse cannot be answered by reference to the current status of legislation on professional law matters.
If experts in that field focus too long on such matters, there is a danger that decisive developments in the profession of geriatric nurse take place outside their field of vision.
It is reported about the recent detection of not yet compensated victims of forced sterilisation during the Third Reich.
The author describes the current state of compensation practice.
From a global viewpoint, tuberculosis is one of the most important infectious diseases of our time.
The situation in Germany, as in most comparable industrialized nations, is stable.
The declining trend of previous years continued in 1997, when 11,163 people developed active tuberculosis - an incidence of 13.6/100,000.
However, the tuberculosis  problem cannot be restricted to one country, and Germany is particularly affected by trends in Eastern Europe and in the former Soviet countries.
These countries experienced a marked increase of tuberculosis  cases and resistant strains during recent  years, a tendency which can only be countered by fast, well-aimed and efficient action in the affected areas.
The industrialized nations in particular should consider financial and logistic contributions as their duty.
Crucial for control of the tuberculosis situation  within each country are registration and  close observation of epidemiological trends, identification of high-risk groups, and continuation of established tuberculosis control measures.
We report about a 61 years old patient, who suffered a rare ulnar dislocation of the ellbow after being arrested by the police.
We report on the eighth known case of a mature metastasis of a mature teratoma of the testis.
In a 19-year-old patient who had undergone a pyeloplasty of the left renal pelvis 6 years before, a mature metastasis of an occult mature teratoma of the testis was found at the former operation site.
This case - in addition to those published previously - emphasizes the fact that a mature teratoma of the testis has to be regarded as a malignant tumor in adults.
It is supposed that the mature teratoma originates, as other testicular tumors, from carcinoma-in-situ-cells, which are responsible for metastasize and are not detected after lysis.
Angiofibromas are usually characterized by their occurences in adolescent males with a typical localization and involvement of the posterior nasal cavity and nasopharynx.
Even the suspicion of an extranasopharyngeal angiofibroma or an angiofibroma in young children must be viewed in general with skepticism, although reports of angiofibromas with atypical localizations and manifestations in young children have appeared in the literature.
Three cases of this fibro-vascular neoplasm with manifestations in the first decade of life and atypical localizations are presented: (1) an angiofibroma medial to the left lacrimal sac in a 15-month old boy, (2) a right paranasal localization in a 9-year-old boy and (3) an angiofibroma limited to the right sphenoid sinus in a 6-year old boy.
In all three cases the neoplasm was resected via an endonasal, micro-endoscopic approach that avoided an external incision.
According to the literature and based on our own experiences with typical histological findings in all three cases, the clinician has to be aware that the rare angiofibroma can occur in pre-adolescent children with atypical localizations.
The endonasal surgical approach is without any doubt the least traumatic one and in selected cases allows resection of a circumscribed tumor considering functional and aesthetic aspects.
Objective: Chronic recurrent abdominal pain in childhood is frequently due to a Helicobacter pylori-associated gastritis.
The diagnosis should be verified either by gastric biopsy culture or by histological investigations of the gastric mucosa in children.
The gastroscopy necessary for this often requires general anesthesia.
The purpose of the present study was to etablish whether an ELISA for Helicobacter pylori has an adequate predictive reliability with regard to the putative gastric histology in order to possibly prevent unnecessary biopsies and associated anesthesias.
Complete dislocated fractures of the thoracic spine may have no neurological deficits if separation is present in the middle of the dorsal column.
In this case there is no injury to the spinal cord, because the "saving fracture" of the vertebral arc prevents it.
One case of a severe dislocated fracture at T11-12 is reported.
In practice, a complete set of X-rays should be done after high-speed trauma, even if no neurological deficit is present.
The treatment is operative by open reduction and fusion from the ventral or dorsal column.
Gamma-hydroxybutyric acid (GHB) is a naturally occurring transmitter in the mammalian brain, related to sleep regulation and possibly to energy balance in diving or hibernating animals.
It has been used for almost 35 years as an intravenous agent for induction of anaesthesia and for long-term sedation.
Its convincing pharmacological properties, without serious adresse effects on circulation or respiration, are compromised by its unpredictable duration of action.
This is not a major problem with long-term sedation during ICU treatment.
GHB has been used with good results for sedation of patients with severe brain injury, where it compares favourably with barbiturates.
In animal studies, it seems to possess a protective action against hypoxia on a cellular and whole organ level.
However, in some experimental animals GHB has been shown to produce seizure-like activities, and the compound is being used to produce absence-like seizures.
GHB has been used in our ICU for years to provide adequate sedation for patients under controlled ventilation or for patients figthing the respirator during spontaneous respiration.
No serious side effects were observed in these patients, while in some patients under haemodialysis hypernatraemia and metabolic alkalosis developed; both were reversible after discontinuation of GHB and restriction of additional sodium input (Somsanit, the commercially available GHB preparation in Germany, contains 9.2 mmol sodium/g; the daily dose averages 20-40 g GHB, i.e.
In Europe ultrasonography has displaced diagnostic peritoneal lavage (DPL) in the primary survey of polytraumatized patients with suspected abdominal trauma.
Hemodynamically unstable patients who are brought to the emergency room with blunt abdominal trauma will go directly to the operating room after a rapid ultrasonography examination with evidence of hemoperitoneum.
In hemodynamically stable patients, in addition to ultrasonography, computed tomography can be done.
This is especially efficient if evaluation with sonography is not completely possible or shows little pathology (e.g.
small amounts of hemoperitoneum).
We report on a posttraumatic aneurysm of the brachiocephalic trunk, something which is rather rare.
The injury was caused by blunt chest trauma following a car accident.
Computed tomography could not find the brachiocephalic lesion.
In patients with fractures of the upper ribs after blunt chest trauma, angiography should be done to exclude severe injuries of the aorta and brachiocephalic vessels.
Even after the strengthening by the law of 1997, the German criminal law regarding corruption is no obstacle for cooperation between medical research and industry.
The injustice of corruption is an irregular exchange between performing one's duty and benefits.
According to this, an enterprise may give funds to a scientist for research purposes if no counter performance exceeding the research is associated with this.
However, it makes a difference if the scientist has to show his appreciation by influencing economic decisions of the clinic in favor of the enterprise.
In case of such an injustice, it is, under the new law, no longer important if the benefit is destined for the scientist himself or for another person or organization.
Thus, it is in the interest of both research and industry to avoid the suspicion of corruption in the first place.
A prerequisite for this is the strict observance of the legal and administrative regulations concerning projects financed by third-party funds.
Since the immune system plays an important role in the rejection of tumours, current tumour therapy includes immunostimulation.
This can be done by interleukin 2 (Il-2), which activates T and killer cells and induces lysis of the tumour.
Because the intravenous application of Il-2 may have serious side effects, we treated two patients with peritumoral injections in a pilot study.
Both patients suffered from multiple cutaneous metastases of melanoma.
A total of 31 and 39x106 IU recombinant Il-2 (Proleukin) respectively was injected in increasing concentrations in one metastasis of each patient.
Histologically, almost complete necrosis of the tumour was induced.
In comparison with the control specimen, the T-cell-rich infiltrate increased intra- and, in particular, peritumorally.
While the ratio of helper to suppressor T cells remained unchanged, the proportions of NK cells, monocytes/macrophages and IL-2-receptor-bearing cells increased.
This reaction was restricted to treated metastases.
No clinical side effects or laboratory changes were registered apart from local erythema and swelling.
Wear of the articulating components (especially PE-UHMW) of total hip endoprostheses is the most important technical factor limiting the functional lifetime.
To minimize wear debris, ceramic heads, according to ISO 6474 (Al2O3), have been used, from 1969 paired with Al2O3 and since 1975 paired with PE-UHMW.
Al2O3 balls articulating with cups made from CFRP have been in clinical use since 1988.
Laboratory experiments and in-vivo testing showed minimized wear debris and mild biological response to wear products using CFRP (carbon fiber reinforced plastic) instead of PE-UHMW as the cup material.
The articulating surfaces of retrieved ceramic heads (Al2O3 - Biolox) and cementless CFRP cups (carbon fiber reinforced plastic, Caproman) were compared using sphericity measurement techniques, scanning electron microscopy (SEM) and roughness measurements (including advanced roughness parameters Rvk or Rpk according to ISO 4287).
Altogether, the first results of the clinical study showed that the combination Al2O3-ball/CFRP-cup came up to the expected lower wear rates compared with the conventional combinations.
The wear rates are comparable with the combination Al2O3/Al2O3 without the material-related problems of ceramic components in all ceramic combinations.
Two cases where DNA typing has been carried out for stain analysis are described.
In both cases Y chromosomal STR systems have been used in combination with autosomal STR systems.
In the first case the DNA from the fingernails of a female victim with skin particles of the male murderer was typed.
The male DNA in this mixture of male and female DNA could be typed.
The excess of female DNA in the samples did not distrub the PCR reaction of Y-chromosomal systems.
In the second case several body parts could be identified to belong to a single male person.
The typing of the suspect's DNA did not give any information because of a family relationship.
Different kinds of stains have been analysed with DYS 389 I/II, DYS 390, DYS 391, DYS 392 DYS 393 and DYS19.
Two multiplex PCR reactions were carried out to save time and stain material.
Although the Y-chromosomal systems are not as polymorphic as autosomal STR systems the analysis of combined haplotypes can give additional information in forensic casework.
In a prospectively designed randomized study, we compared the efficacy of sublingual nitroglycerine and intravenous enalaprilat in the out-of-hospital treatment of 46 hypertensive patients with pulmonary edema (defined as rales over both lungs and systolic blood pressure >200 mm Hg and diastolic blood pressure >100 mg).
The out-of-hospital treatment consists of oxygen (6 Ll/min) via a face mask, furosemide 80 mg i.v., opioids 10 mg s.c., and either sublingual nitroglycerine (n=23; initial dose: 0.8 mg; repetitive application of 0.8 mg every 10 min until a cumulative dose of 3.2 mg) or intravenous enalaprilat (initial dose: 2.5 mg; repetitive application of 2.5 mg every 30 min until a cumulative dose of 10 mg).
The aim of the antihypertensive treatment was a reduction of systolic blood pressure below 160 mm Hg and diastolic blood pressure below 90 mm Hg until admission to the emergency department.
In the emergency room, an arterial and venous blood sample was taken to determine the respiratory (pO2, pCO2) and metabolic status (pH value; base-excess; serum lactate) of the patient.
Successful antihypertensive treatment was observed in 13/23 (57%) patients of the enalaprilat group and 15/23 (65%) patients of the nitroglycerine group (p=0.54).
Systolic and diastolic blood pressure on admission were similiar in both treatment groups (systolic RR: enalaprilat: 179 [31] mm Hg; nitroglycerine: 184 [38] mm Hg; p=0.59; diastolic RR: enalaprilat: 96 [14] mm Hg; nitroglycerine: 101 [14] mm Hg; p=0.12).
No significant differences were observed between the enalaprilat and the nitroglycerine groups concerning respiratory and metabolic parameters on admission (pO2: 67 [15] vs. 64 [17] mm Hg; p=0.50; pCO2: 46 [9] vs. 47 [13]; p=0.75; pH value: 7.27 [0.12] vs. 7.27 [0.09]; p=0.98; BE: -4.2 [3.7] vs. -5.7 [4.1]; p=0.23; lactate: 4.2 [3.3] vs. 4.2 [2.7]; p=0.98).
Intravenous enalaprilat did not exhibit any advantage compared to nitroglycerine in terms of blood pressure reduction or respiratory and metabolic parameters on admission to the emergency room.
We conclude that enalaprilat is no substitute for nitroglycerine in the out-of-hospital treatment of hypertensive patients with pulmonary edema.
Paragangliomas of the glomus caroticum are relatively rare, but highly vascularized neoplasmas, which develop from chemoreceptors.
They can be develop at anyage, but most often in the third or fourth decade of life.
Paragangliomas grow very slowly and are most always of benign origin.
There is a familial predisposition, and an autosomal-dominant transmission is presumed.
They are commonly located in the jugular region; in rare cases a polytopic manifestation is found.
We describe the case of a 47-year-old male patient who was referred to our department because of a progressive swelling of the neck on both sides.
Contrast-enhanced computed tomography had displayed soft tissue tumors in the jugular regions.
We performed an operative exploration, which showed a highly vascularized tumor.
Histopathologic analysis revealed the diagnosis of a paraganglioma.
An angiography of the neck and thoracic region, furthermore, revealed an additional paraganglioma in the anterior mediastinum.
Using a surgical approach via lateral cervicotomies and thoracotomy the paragangliomas were extirpated.
Our case report demonstrates the rare polytopic manifestation of paragangliomas.
This perivascular neoplasms have to be removed before haemodynamic complications develop.
The extent of this tumors is clearly illustrated by use of an angiography.
Because of the familial predisposition, clinical and radiological examinations of relatives are mandatory.
In more than 30 years of development of intensive care medicine (ICM), our speciality has acquired moral and ethical standpoints, although not without public pressure and discussions.
Special commissions dealing, e.g., with brain death, terminal care, ethics of foregoing life-sustaining treatment in the critically ill, withholding or withdrawing mechanical ventilation, and other issues have meen formed in a number of medical societies.
International consensus conferences have helped to clarify some of the issues.
With increasing experience, a multitude of ethical problems have arisen in ICM that have to be dealt with, such as the issue of quality of life.
What is an unworthy life?
Are we allowed to make judgments for our patients?
What is cost-effectiveness in ICM?
Other restrictions include bed and equipment shortages in the intensive care unit (ICU), the necessity for triage - undisputed in catastrophe medicine - and how one should proceed in managing elective patients?
In situations of limited ICU bed availability, sicker patients will be admitted, sparing out patients who are less ill for observation and those with poor quality of life and poor prognosis.
For the future, it will likely be necessary to define the patients who should be admitted to an ICU more than those who should not be admitted.
An ICU treatment entitlement index would be directly proportional to the probability of successful outcome and the quality of the remaining life, and would be inversely related to costs for achieving success.
The ICU outcome with survival, hospital mortality, and follow-up of ICU patients is considered.
DNR (do not resuscitate), the dying patient, terminal care, terminal weaning - DNT (do not treat) - active and passive euthanasia, living wills, quality of life, and cost-effectiveness for ICU patients are defined.
Their application in the ICU will be discussed and problems pointed out.
Outcome predictions using scores (APACHE III, SAPS II, MPM) have been developed based on previous experience, but should only be applied to patient groups and for quality assurance in ICUs.
The most frequent and difficult problem in the ICU is the vegetative state, which requires an exact diagnosis.
The differential diagnosis from other comatose states such as coma, brain death, and locked-in-syndrome is depicted.
The ethics of interrupting life-sustaining treatment in critically ill patients have been worked out by a Task Force on Ethics of the Society of Critical Care Medicine (1990).
A consensus was found that the patient may judge to forego therapy; ethically it is then appropriate to withhold or withdraw therapy.
According to the consensus, withdrawing an already initiated treatment should not necessarily be regarded as more problematic than a decision not to initiate treatment.
In my mind, however, there is a great difference between withdrawing or withholding, e.g., ventilation.
A dissentive opinion by some members of the Task Force stated that hydration and nutrition other than high-technology or parenteral nutrition are key components of patient care, and should not be equated with medical intervention.
The ethical problems associated with active euthanasia (physician-assisted suicide or death) as practised in the Netherlands are also discussed.
In most countries this practice seems unacceptable.
From 30 years experience in ICM, there are many more ethical questions and case reports without clear solutions.
Care decisions for single patients in unacceptable situations should be made after medical evaluation by the intensivist with the medical team and, if possible, by the patient and/or his or her surrogate.
Legislation and solutions cannot be expected for single patients, but ethics committees could be helpful in decision-making.
Pseudarthroses of the spine are classified into congenital, acquired non-traumatic, posttraumatic and postoperative (iatrogenic) pseudarthroses.
The various types of non-unions of the spine are described according to their clinical and radiological appearance.
In line with their clinical importance, special attention with respect to the operative treatment is given to non-union of the axis of C2 and to spondylolysis.
For the pseudarthrosis of the dens a posterior fusion according to Gallie-Brooks is recommended, in spondylolyses without marked slipping a "direct repair" should be considered in young patients.
207 osteosarcomas were examined morphologically after neoadjuvant chemotherapy according to the COSS-86 protocol using representative slides of one whole tumor plane.
The rate of responders 63 %.
In relapse-free patients both the whole tumors and the vital areas there of were smaller than in patients with relapse during a follow-up period of 5 years.
Within the subgroup of osteoblastic osteosarcomas, metastases were observed following smaller tumors than in chondroblastic osteosarcomas.
Therefore, in addition to degree of regression, histological subtype and tumor size should be considered in the prognostic evaluation of osteosarcomas.
The possibilities of using different material combinations for the replacement of knee joint endoprostheses are very limited.
Therefore, cobalt-chromium-molybdenum alloys are currently being used for femoral components and ultra-high molecular weight polyethylene for tribologically stressed tibial components.
Titanium alloys can be considered for the tibial component only.
The fixation of hamstring grafts in ACL reconstruction requires a connector device.
During the process of ingrowing the graft stability depends entirely on the fixation.
The following study focused on the mechanical conditions of no 6 Ethibond, 5 mm Mersilene tape and 5 mm Polylene tape.
The material were tested as loops with a length of 30 mm including the knot similar to intraoperative conditions.
The ultimate tension load and elongation of the conditioned and unconditioned loops were investigated under cyclic load of 50 N and 100 N using a tension load machine.
The ultimate tension load increased significantly only for Mersilene from 416 N to 462 N. However, the highest ultimate tension load showed Polylene with 479 N. The oscillating load up to 100 N revealed for unconditioned loops and elongation of 4.1 mm for Ethibond, 2.9 mm for Polylene and 5.4 mm for Mersilene.
The elongation decreased significantly for the conditioned loops to a maximum of 1.4 mm.
Concerning the amplitude during the period of oscillating load there was found a significant reduction as well.
Based on our results Polylene showed the best mechanical properties.
Regardless the intraoperatively used material we advocate the conditioning of the loops before anchoring the hamstring graft in ACL reconstruction.
On the basis of the results of 327 knee arthroscopies in children aged between 2 and 17 years in the period from 1985 to 1995 we attempt to evaluate the current status of this procedure.
Arthroscopy as a diagnostic intervention in trauma with haemarthrosis or in any kind of knee effusion is progressively being replaced by sophisticated ultrasound techniques or MRI.
This trend shows a predominant therapeutic use of knee arthroscopy.
Taking our own "incorrect" clinical diagnoses as a starting point we look at common problems in the accurate clinical examination of the symptomatic knee in younger children.
Rational utilization of all kinds of modern diagnostic measures will reduce purely diagnostic arthroscopies in favour of therapeutic endoscopic interventions thus reducing perioperative risks to a minimum.
The pathogenesis of cortical blindness as a rare complication in severe preeclampsia is still unclear.
The case of a women with postpartum blindness is reported in which CT and MRI initially showed cortical and subcortical edema in the parieto-occipital lobes.
At this time cerebral angiography and transcranial color-coded sonography (TCCS) revealed widespread cerebral vasospasm.
Mean blood flow velocities in the middle and posterior cerebral artery and carotid syphon initially reached 380 cm/s and normalized within 2 weeks.
While the patient's vision improved rapidly, follow-up MRI disclosed ischemic lesions and petechial hemorrhage in the occipital cortex.
This case provides rare documentation that transient blindness in patients with preeclampsia may result from parieto-occipital ischemia due to cerebral vasospasm.
In such patients TCCS may be useful to detect vasospasm associated with preeclampsia/eclampsia.
The principle of photodynamic therapy (PDT) for rheumatoid arthritis consists in specifically concentrating a drug (photosensitizer) in the synovium.
Subsequent activation of the photosensitizer by means of a laser leads to a cytotoxic effect.
The practicability of PDT was tested in an animal model of IgG-induced arthritis in rabbits.
Photosan-3, 5-aminolevulinic acid and BPD-MA were administered intraarticularly or intravenously.
In this model, concentration of the photosensitizer in the synovial lining cells, the lymphoid infiltrate, and the skin was seen.
After laser irradiation a selective demarcation and destruction of the synovium by prior administration of Photosan-3, not constant by BPD-MA and without therapeutic effect by 5-aminolevulinic acid, was observed.
In contrast, bradytrophic tissues such as cartilage, meniscus, and ligament structures were changed neither macroscopically nor microscopically in all series.
PDT thus offers ideal preconditions for minimal invasive treatment of chronic inflammatory joint diseases because of its selectivity and efficacy.
Photodynamic laser therapy can be considered a new method in the surgical treatment of inflammatory disease of the synovial membrane.
The purpose of the study was to identify associations between drug prescriptions and the risk of falls in community-dwelling frail elderly people.
Enlargement of the prostate is an age-related, physiological process that is unique in human tissue.
The prostate gland is the most common site of neoplastic disorders in men.
Despite the growing impact of the various prostate diseases in terms of morbidity and mortality, the pathogenesis of benign prostate hyperplasia (BPH) and prostate cancer remains poorly understood.
This reflects the complex composition of the gland with different anatomic, cellular and functional compartments that are differentially involved in benign and malignant disease processes.
The present review summarizes new concepts on the morphogenesis of normal and abnormal growth in the human prostate.
There is increasing evidence that prostatic stem cells are located in the basal cell layer that is basically involved in normal growth and the development of glandular hyperplasia and prostate cancer.
High-grade prostatic intraepithelial neoplasia is considered the most likely precursor of clinically important cancer of the peripheral zone.
Severe differentiation and proliferation abnormalities occur during malignant transformation of the prostatic epithelium.
These premalignant changes are associated with abnormal expression of growth factor receptors, oncogene and suppressor gene products and genetic instability.
During the process of stromal invasion the transformed cells lose their basal cell phenotype and produce basement mem- brane-like matrices.
Common prostate cancer is mainly composed of exocrine cell types that remain androgen-responsive even in hormone-independent disease.
The frequent occurrence of neuroendocrine differentiation in common prostate cancer reflects the differentiation potency of its stem cells.
The endocrine phenotype derives from exocrine tumor cells via intermediate (amphicrine) cell types.
Neuroendocrine tumor cells consistently lack the nuclear androgen receptor and represent an androgen-insensitive cell population in prostate cancer.
Questionnaires were mailed anonymously to 150 German shock wave centers.
Twenty questions addressed the following areas of interest: - Facilities of the extracorporeal shock wave lithotripsy (ESWL) center (technical, personnel, laboratory, etc.)
- Cooperation at ESWL center with referring urologists - Laboratory facilities versus actual metabolic work-up.
The return rate was 114 of 150 (76 %).
Surprisingly, at 58 % of the centers the average number of treatments is less than two per day.
In 30 % of the centers only chemical stone analysis is done!
The final conclusion was that ESWL has largely replaced the causal metabolic work-up and subsequent metaphylaxis as a symptomatic measure against urolithiasis.
Based on current insurance data patients with pseudophakia can be expected to suffer reduced stereoacuity.
A prospective study was carried out to test this relationship.
In 1970 Aulhorn and Harms made fundamental recommendations for the night driving ability of motorists as well as for the corresponding examination methods.
Reduced night driving ability of persons over the age of 60, as well the established limits for twilight vision and glare sensitivity, and their relevance to night-time collisions has been re-examined.
Hernias of the obturator foramen are rare.
They are described mostly in elderly female patients in poor health.
Often the correct diagnosis is stumbled upon as a result of surprising intraoperative findings.
Surgical therapy is indicated often by the clinical symptoms of an incarcerated hernia.
Herniation of the entire urinary bladder with hemorrhagic infarction has never been described before.
For an anatomical reduction of the hernia it was neccesary to resect the superior pubic ramus.
For plastic reconstruction a marlex mesh was used.
ACL reconstruction with patellar tendon graft has become a standard procedure.
The graft can be inserted either using two tunnels and a lateral femoral incision or with a femoral half tunnel drilled from the joint, thus avoiding the lateral incision.
Advantages of the single-incision technique in the early rehabilitation period have been claimed.
40 patients with ACL deficiency were included in a prospective randomized trial comparing single and two-incision technique with a follow-up period of 4 years.
Preoperative data did not show any significant difference between the two groups.
At follow-up no differences were observed with respect to complications or the progress of rehabilitation.
Evaluation after 1 and 4 years according to the IKDC form revealed good to excellent results in 70 % of all patients.
The Tegner-score increased significantly, however most patients did not regain their former activity level.
ACL-reconstruction reduced anterior translation of the knee significantly at 6 months follow-up.
However, we observed a slight increase of anterior translation after 1 and 4 years in both groups; stability was comparable in both groups at all time periods.
We conclude that an arthroscopic singleincision technique has no advantage compared to a mini-open two-incision technique for ACL reconstruction with patellar tendon graft in terms of subjective or objective parameters.
For determining the prevalence of multiple sclerosis (MS) in Germany, the outcomes of several epidemiological studies are available.
If these rates are transferred to Germany as a whole, figures result of 67,000 to 138,000 MS patients in all.
The differing prevalence rates may be caused by various problems in finding patients, the epidemiological area, and different population structures.
To avoid these difficulties, a new approach for calculating the number of patients with diagnosed MS was chosen based on representative samples taken from the groups of physicians involved in MS treatment.
The disadvantage of this approach is that it does not allow any questioning of the diagnosis.
Projecting the results in this way and their subsequent compilation - taking "double treatments" into consideration - showed a total of 122,000 patients with diagnosed multiple sclerosis in Germany.
This figure corresponds to a prevalence rate of 149.1 per 100,000 inhabitants and is within the range found by Poser et al.
[19]: 127 per 100,000 excluding the diagnostic category "possible multiple sclerosis" and 170 per 100,000 including it.
The chemical synthesis of alkyl glucuronides, which appear as metabolites in urine after the consumption of beverages containing congeners of ethanol, is described.
Glucuronides of the following alcohols were synthesized: methanol, d5-ethanol, propanol, isopropanol, butanol, isobutanol, R-(-)-2-butanol, S-(+)-2-butanol, isopentanol and S-(-)-2-methylbutanol.
The retention indices of acetyl, pentafluorpropyl (PFP) and trimethylsilyl (TMS) derivatives are given and discussed in relation to the chemical structures.
Mass spectra of homologous derivatives were shown to be very similar but some fragments were specific for the chain length of the alkyl moiety and can be used for identification and a quantitative estimation of glucuronides in urine samples.
Decreasing numbers of tuberculosis cases in the western countries have led to diminished attention towards this disease.
But worldwide, tuberculosis still is the leading cause of mortality due to any one single infectious agent.
In the industrialized countries, immigration, growth of low-income groups and increasing numbers of immunocompromised patients, mainly due to the HIV epidemic, supply a reservoir for tuberculosis.
Five efficient STR systems were investigated by automated laser fluorescence analysis on an A.L.F.
The system HumACTBP2 and the combinations of the systems HumVWA/FGA and HumTH01/D12S391 in duplex reactions were analysed.
DNA samples could be analysed with a high sensitivity (100 pg) and the results were reproducible.
No allele drop-out was observed.
Using specific allelic ladders, the inter and intra gel deviation was less than 0.5 bp.
The allele frequencies, the mean exclusion chance values and the discrimination power  for all five systems are shown.
The combination of the five systems resulted in a power of discrimination of 99.9999989%.
Few technological developments have impacted health sciences over the last years like the internet.
This comes at a time when electronic acquisition, storage and processing of medical data becomes commonplace in the so-called developed countries.
New forms of integrated medical services will eventually evolve from these two trends.
For information taken from many medical resources on the internet a relative lack of review processes requires special care and selection.
The co-operation of different health providers can be facilitated using technological standards initially established for other purposes.
This article is directed towards the gynecologist interested in practical use of the internet and its technologies and critically reviews the value of sample sites on the net.
The accompanying internet website lists relevant resources.
A calculation model was developed for the cost of stone therapy and metaphylaxis in Germany based on estimates of stone incidence, types and recurrence rates, actual costs for stone removal and metaphylaxis (based on data from a district of the social health care system).
There are 200,000 stone recurrences per year in Germany.
Cost for treatment of these stones amount to $687,000,000.
Stone metaphylaxis reduces the recurrence rate by some 40 %.
The annual cost for stone removal could be lowered by $275,300,000.
Metabolic evaluation/metaphylaxis amount to $70,100,000 per year, resulting in an net saving of $205,200,000.
In 1997, there were 96 days off-work per stone patient resulting in 5,800,000 days off-work in Germany per year.
Metaphylaxis in stone formers can lower health care cost significantly.
Although health care conditions may vary from country to country, in principle this calculation model is applicable also to other countries.
Consideration of estrogen replacement therapy is well established in the treatment of postmenopausal syndrome and osteoporosis in menopause.
Some observational epidemiologic studies on this topic have suggested beneficial effects on cardiovascular disease.
A prospective, controlled, randomized clinical trial with respect to cardiovascular events and mortality in postmenopausal hormone users, the HERS (Heart and Estrogen/Progestin Replacement) study has recently been published.
Antiischemic effects of estrogens are mediated by improvement of menopausal-associated endothelial dysfunction, calcium antagonism, and activation of endothelial synthesis of prostacyclin.
Improvement in functional state and reduction of stress-induced myocardial ischemia with hormone replacement therapy (HRT) have been demonstrated in several clinical trials.
Inflammatory stimuli induce the expression of adhesion molecules on leukocytes and endothelial cells.
The adhesive forces between leukocytes and the vascular endothelium are antagonized by the shear stress of the flowing blood.
The aim of this study was to examine how differences in the apparent wall shear rate measured in iris venules with varying caliber affect leukocyte-endothelium interaction.
Radiologic means aid in assessment of the most suitable side for operation and allow the surgeon to be prepared for special situations in order to perform the operation without difficulties [22].
The most suitable modalities are CT and MRI preoperatively.
In uncomplicated cases, conventional imaging suffices for the postoperative needs.
CT should only be performed if the patient complains of symptoms.
Systemic immunotherapy, notably with interleukin-2 (IL-2) and interferon- (IFN), has yielded a response rate of 10 % to 30 % in metastic renal cell carcinoma.
However, systemic immunotherapy is limited by severe side effects, and long-lasting response is rare.
Tumor palliation and quality-of-life are important end points for evaluating the clinical benefits of immunotherapy.
Experimental and clinical treatment models have proved that local IL-2 application is less toxic than systemic treatment and is therapeutically effective.
Here we report long-term experience with inhalation IL-2 therapy in 188 patients who had progressive pulmonary metastatic renal cell carcinoma.
High-dose inhalation of IL-2 was used with low-dose systemic IL-2 or IFN.
Maximal toxicity over the total treatment time was mild, and the low incidence of WHO grade 3 toxicity (24 %) allowed social activities and peformance of social roles.
Comedication for systemic side effects was required only in half of the patients.
Inhaled IL-2 prevented progress of pulmonary metastases in 68 % of patients for a median period of 9.8 months.
Median survival was 12.4 months compared with the expected 5.3 months and quality-of-life did not differ substantially from pretreatment status.
Local treatment can be applied alone or in combination with systemic therapy and can increase therapeutic efficacy.
It is now well known that chronic alcohol abuse is an important factor for developing head and neck squamous cell carcinoma (HNSCC).
While hospitalized, these patients are at great risk for developing an unexpected alcohol-withdrawal syndrome.
Compared to common markers of alcohol abuse, carbohydrate-deficient transferrin (CDT) has been found to be more sensitive and specific.
It is therefore very useful for detecting alcoholism and controlling compliance of alcohol withdrawal.
We analyzed the serum concentrations of CDT, liver enzymes and mean corpuscular volume in 49 male patients with HNSCC.
Elevated CDT levels were found in more than 25% of patients who earlier denied a history of chronic alcohol abuse.
Over one-third of these patients developed an alcohol-withdrawal syndrome.
These findings demonstrated that analysis of elevated CDT serum levels was a valuable method for detecting chronic alcohol abuse and recognizing patients at risk for developing an alcohol-withdrawal syndrome postoperatively.
Apoptosis, or programmed cell death, plays an essential role in specific cell deletion during normal embryonal and adult development.
Apoptotic cells are characterized by fragmentation of nuclear DNA and formation of apoptotic bodies.
Molecular genetic analysis has revealed the involvement of several deaths and survival genes that are regulated by extracellular and intracellular factors.
There are multiple inducers and inhibitors which interact with target cellspecific receptors and transduce signals involved in cellular proliferation, cell cycle progression and programmed cell death.
The elimination of tumor cell populations by applying lethal doses of chemotherapeutic agents or radiation is a well-established strategy in cancer therapy.
Although improved cytotoxic chemo- and radiotherapy regimens are available, the efficacy of these strategies is still disappointing with regard to many solid tumors.
Better understanding of the molecular mechanism of apoptosis, including death genes, death signals, receptors and signal transduction pathways, will provide new approaches in the development of strategies to regulate malignant cell survival and death.
Recent discoveries in the field of apoptotic cell death promise to have a significant impact on antitumor therapies.
Apoptosis is known to be an active process which can be artificially manipulated by several molecular pathways.
This information concerning the regulation and induction of programmed cell death might lead among otherthings, to the development of new powerful means to eliminate malignant cell populations of otherwise resistant genitourinary tumors such as prostate cancer.
We report on a 63-year-old female patient with Muir-Torre syndrome (MTS).
In the course of this disease two carcinomas of the colon, a kerato-acanthoma and multiple sebaceous gland tumours, including four sebaceous gland tumours, including four sebaceous carcinomas, appeared.
This case is thought to be a heriditary form as one of daughters was also found to have a sebaceous epithelioma.
MTS is a mostly autosomal-dominant disease with the association of sebaceous gland tumours and internal carcinomas.
As the malignant tumours only show slight aggressiveness the prognosis is quite favourable.
Oral isotretinoin therapy was successfully used for the inhibition of sebaceous gland proliferation.
A narrower definition is presented and an updated survey of the published cases is given.
Furthermore, the histopathologic peculiarities of sebaceous gland tumours, especially of sebaceous gland carcinomas, are discussed and compared to sebaceous gland tumours not connected with MTS.
A total number of 100 of the 135 published cases of MTS were included and analysed regarding sebaceous gland tumours and other skin tumours.
The data on internal carcinomas were taken from the work of Cohen et al.
(1991) and 11 current cases were added.
The rapid development of modern endovascular, microsurgical, and radiation therapies has considerably expanded the treatment options for encephalic arteriovenous malformations (AVMs).
Surgery has the longest history.
Single or staged intravascular procedures (embolizations) using fast-acting glues, sclerotic agents, and thrombogenic coils serve to reduce the size of AVM to that suitable for extirpation and may reduce the risk of surgery.
Radiation ("gamma-knife") therapy, most frequently used in small, non-operable AVMs, is also viewed by some authors as an alternative or even superior tool in small, operable malformations.
Partial embolization to reduce the mass-effect of space-occupying AVMs, to reverse diaschisis, and to treat AVM-related seizure disorders is being discussed and practiced.
Given the in part competing or even controversial options, the selection of optimal treatment for AVM patients is becoming increasingly difficult.
Current management is impeded by the paucity of information on the exact risks of invasive therapies and by insufficient criteria for identifying patients at risk of spontaneous bleeding during the natural course, including the seriousness of such hemorrhage.
A new "all in one" sensing device was developed for continuous transtracheal intraoperative monitoring and in situ detection of the recurrent laryngeal nerve (RLN) during thyroid surgery.
Patients and methods: The new system is based on a double-balloon endotracheal tube with integrated atraumatic stimulating and tracing electrodes.
The recurrent laryngeal nerve is stimulated transtracheally and compound action potentials are recorded from the laryngeal muscles.
Fifty-five patients were introduced into a phase-one clinical trial.
Thirty-five patients with primary thyroid operations, 20 patients with reoperations, 10 of whom had neck dissections.
All patients were evaluated laryngoscopically and phoniatrically by an ENT specialist before and after surgery.
Results: Compound muscle action potentials were recorded continuously during the whole operation and responded sensitively to tension and pressure to the nerve.
There were no accidental permanent RLN palsies.
Conclusion: The new system offers five advantages: (1) it is atraumatic; (2) it is easy to use; (3) it can monitor continuously with an audio feedback to the surgeon; (4) it works outside the operation field; and (5) it is highly sensitive, even indicating reversible irritation to the nerve.
The diagnosis of primary malignant bone tumors, which only account for 1% of malignancies in humans, represents quite a challange for the pathologist.
Apart from the often overlapping morphology between different entities, heterogeneity within one and the same tumor has to be kept in mind.
Furthermore, in most cases the diagnosis must be established based on small biopsy specimens and occasionally even on frozen sections.
In this context detailed clinical information including the patient's age and exact localization of the tumor, as depicted by X-ray or MRI, are essential requirements for a correct diagnosis.
In addition, multiple biopsies from different tumor sites may be of help.
For example, 25% of osteogenic sarcomas (OSA) are chondroplastic.
Others may contain areas similar to fibrosarcoma (FSA) or malignant fibrous histiocytoma (MFH).
Since 90% of OSA occur in the second decade of life whereas chondrosarcomas, FSA and MFH usually manifest after the age of 40 years, a biopsy solely composed of malignant chondromatous tissue obtained from a tibial lesion of a 10-year-old child should most likely be considered as part of an OSA.
In the differential diagnosis of the so-called small, round cell tumors, which include Ewing sarcoma, malignant lymphoma and small-cell OSA, immunohistochemical staining of the paraffin-embedded material and a molecular biological/genetic work-up of frozen material are most helpful.
In this paper the histomorphological characteristics and criteria for differential diagnosis of the most common primary malignant bone tumors are discussed.
The care of the patient after primary treatment is very important for both tumor control and patientsi compliance.
The aim of this care concept should be the early detection of local recurrences so as to have better secondary treatment (maybe cure) options.
If expensive diagnostics are needed to get this information, it is reasonable to order them.
If there is no benefit for the patient, regarding survival or with respect to quality of life, clinical anamnesis and examination should be preferred.
The effect on pain and heat sensation of monomere non-ionic contrast media with different osmolality was assessed in a randomized double-blind study.
Peripheral angiography was performed in 29 patients who suffered from chronic occlusive vessel disease.
The two non-ionic contrast media iomeprol and iopentol were applied intraindividually.
The contrast media with an iodine concentration of 350 mg/ml had an osmolality of 618 or 810 mosm/kg.
A contrast medium volume of 80 or 90 ml was injected in the abdominal aorta.
The mean flow was 13.9 ml/s.
The two contrast medium injections were separated by an interval of 10 min.
No analgesic premedication was given.
The pain and heat intensity was semiquantatively measured using a visual analogue scale ranging from 0 (no heat/pain) to 100 (intractable heat/pain).
The median after the first injection was calculated as 40 for iomeprol and 70 for iopentol.
The comparison of heat and pain sensations after the second injection showed a less distinct difference with a scale rating of 60 for iomeprol and of 65 for iopentol.
The statistical variance was highly significant (p < 0.01) in favor of iomeprol.
Shampooing is the most common form of hair treatment.
Shampoos have primarily been products aimed at cleansing the hair and scalp.
The diversity of qualities demanded from a good shampoo by today's consumer go far beyond this general function.
A cosmetic benefit is expected, and the shampoo formulation has to be tailored to all the possible variations associated with hair quality (dry, greasy, permed, bleached, dyed), age (baby shampoo), care habit (frequency of shampooing) and specific problems relating to the superficial condition of the scalp (dandruff, seborrhea).
Selected ingredients of shampoos that have been popular with the consumer are currently under attack because of potential risks associated with their use (e. g. halogenated organic compounds, formaldehyde, musk fragrances, and crude coal tar).
Our standard graduate training programs devote limited attention to  the subject of shampoos, and much of the readily available information concerning shampoos is supplied by the industry.
We should be increasingly aware that our patients look to us to supply independent information on what can be expected from a shampoo to enable them to make more informed choices at the consumer level.
In industrialized countries the rate of sudden cardiac death remains unchanged.
The most frequently encountered structural heart disease in these patients is coronary artery disease.
Despite the era of thrombolytic therapy of acute myocardial infarction patients carry an increased risk of sudden cardiac arrhythmogenic death within a time period of one to two years following the acute event.
Therefore, risk stratification post-MI before patient discharge is furthermore mandatory.
Dysphagia is related to the impairment of food passage from the mouth to the stomach.
Globus pharyngis implies the frequent and often painful sensation of a lump in the throat that usually does not interfere with swallowing and may even be relieved by food intake.
The diagnosis is based upon a careful history, clinical examination, endoscopy, dynamic imaging (videofluoroscopy, cinematography, videosonography) and electrophysiologic procedures (including pharyngoesophageal manometry, electromyography and pH determinations).
Structural lesions of the cervical spine such as diffuse idiopathic skeletal hyperostosis are rare causes of dysphagia.
Dysphagia following anterior cervical fusion as well as globus and dysphonia due to dysfunction of the vertebral joints are more likely.
Symptoms with swallowing fluids indicate a neurogenic origin.
Dyscoordinated swallowing, nasal reflux, dysphonia or general weakness may also occur.
Chronic aspiration with respiratory compromize is the main consequence in a variety of neurological disorders as well as in cases of postsurgical dysphagia.
Relaxation of the upper esophageal sphincter indicates coordinated muscle movement between the pharynx and esophagus.
Dysfunction of the pharyngoesophageal segment may lead to cricopharyngeal achalasia.
A dyskinetic sphincter commonly represents an extrapharyngeal cause: i.e., disease associated with gastroesophageal reflux.
Disorders of the esophageal phase of deglutition can produce retrosternal pain, heartburn, regurgitation and vomiting, as well as laryngeal and respiratory signs.
Esophageal motility disorders include lower achalasia, tumors, peptic strictures, inflammatory diseases, drug-induced ulcers, rings and webs.
Motility disorders present with aperistaltic, spontaneous contractions, diffuse esophagospasm, or a hypermotile esophagus.
Gastroesophageal reflux with esophagitis must always be excluded, especially in patients with a globus sensation.
The multiple features of the appearance of the symptoms of dysphagia and globus makes multidisciplinary approach necessary in order to establish a diagnosis and begin effective treatment.
Different pest arthropods and dermatophytes occurring primarily in farm animals may be transmissible to man and produce human dermatoses.
The movement and cutaneous penetration habits of external parasites often cause crusted papules, severe itching and dermatitis or may damage their hosts by blood-sucking or by sensitizing them to their saliva.
Furthermore different dermatophytes should be considered a possible cause of human skin lesions.
Farm animals (cattle, pig, poultry, and rabbit) can transmit external parasites (ticks: Ixodes ricinus, Argas reflexus; fleas: Ceratophyllus gallinae, Spilopsyllus cuniculi, and mites: Sarcoptes scabiei var.
bovis, Sarcoptes scabiei var.
suis, Dermanyssus gallinae, Cheyletiella parasitovorax), and dermatophytes (Trichophyton sp., and Microsporum sp.).
People who have close contact to infested farm animals are more often exposed to epizoonotic infections.
Certain professions, such as farmers, and veterinarians, are especially vulnerable.
Between 1992 and 1994 two multicentre studies were performed in order to determine the frequency of sensitization to gold salts.
In the first study (1992-1993), 872 patients were tested with gold sodium thiosulfate (NTS) 0.25% in Vaseline (V), 0.5% V. and with potassium dicyanoaurate (KDC) 0.002% aqueous solution.
44 patients (5.1%) had a positive patch test reaction to gold salts: 40 (4.6%) to NTS 0.5% V., 20 (2.3%) to NTS 0.25% V. and 5 (0.6%) to KDC.
A higher number of positive patch tests to gold salts was noted in patients also sensitized to another metal salt (8.5%) as compared to those who showed no other sensitivities (3.6%).
Immunologial complications frequently occur during the clinical course in patients with multiple injuries.
The increased release of pro-inflammatory mediators during the immunological response to trauma may lead to the systemic inflammatory response syndrome (SIRS) and furthermore, to multisystem organ failure (MOF), which is associated with a mortality of up to 80%.
The development of multiple organ failure following major trauma is associated with remote organ failure, the dysfunction of organs which were not initially affected by the traum.
This manuscript reviews recent data in experimental trauma research and offers a more detailed evaluation of the immunological findings in trauma patients.
In particular, the role of pro- and anti-inflammatory cytokines in the development or SIRS, MOF and ROF is discussed.
Despite the enormous progress in clinical immunology and the available data on trauma-induced immune dysfunction, a large number of questions still remain to be answered before the immunological alterations following severe trauma can be beneficially influenced by immunomodulatory therapeutic efforts.
A report on two cases with benign tumors of the atrioventricular node (so-called mesothelioma of the av-node or endodermal inclusions of the heart).
In one of the cases the tumor could be the cause of the known electrophysiological disturbance of the conduction system (av-block) and of the sudden and unexpected death.
A case of delayed death after a low-voltage accident is presented.
At first, an obvious source of electricity was not found.
However, electric marks were found on the fingers.
The identification of the conductor was performed by analysis of the metallisation of the electric marks.
The location of the probable conductors in a boiler under the hand basin and the discovery in a standing position prior to collapse in a bathtub indicates that the capability to act was preserved for a short time period.
In such rare cases death seems to be a result of cardiac arrhythmia resulting in ventricular fibrillation.
A 53-year-old man presented a melanotic lung tumor which was based in the bronchus of the left lower lobe and closed the left main bronchus.
After laser therapy, left lobectomy with sleeve resection was carried out.
Complications after the surgery required resection of the rest of the left lung and thoracoplasty.
Based on the histological and immunohistochemical findings, the tumor was classified as a malignant melanoma.
There was no past history of an excision or a fulguration of a cutaneous, mucous membrane, or ocular lesion.
Examination of the skin and the eyes did not yield any evidence of another primary tumor.
We conclude that the lesion represents a primary malignant melanoma of the respiratory tract, a rare neoplasm of which only 21 cases have been confirmed.
The patient does not have any evidence of tumor in the relatively short follow-up period of 10 months.
Background: To find out the incidence of spontaneous pubertal development in girls with Turner syndrome we investigated patients with a bone age of at least eleven years.
Results: 6 out of 17 patients showed spontaneous puberty.
There exists no clear correlation between karyotype and phenotype on the one hand and incidence of spontaneous puberty on the other.
Basal as well as stimulated gonadotropin levels in the late childhood could better indicate spontaneous puberty in Turner syndrome.
Conclusion: In contrast to the generally held opinion spontaneous pubertal development is not rare in girls with Turner syndrome.
Therefore estrogen replacement therapy should be started only after it became certain that there will be no spontaneous puberty.
From January 1992 until April 1995, 31 patients with trans- and suprasphincteric anal fistulae (transsphincteric n = 21; suprasphincteric n = 4; transsphincteric in Crohn's disease n = 6) underwent a fistulectomy followed by closure of the internal opening by suture and anocutaneous flap.
All patients had undergone previous operations, some several times.
The recurrence rate of 13 % appeared to be low after a short follow-up.
Continence was only negligibly impaired, although the anal resting pressure and contraction pressure were significantly reduced.
In five patients a shortened prewarning period was noticed.
Also in Crohn's fistulae the results were equivalent when the surgical treatment was performed in a non-inflammatory period.
Staging of malignant tumours of the oral cavity and the oropharynx not only requires far more than a basic knowledge of anatomy and the usual pathways of spread, but also a broad understanding of the diagnostic benefits of current imaging modalities.
As radiology should never try to replace histology, the main aim should be precise prediction of tumour margins and differention of tumour from edema and posttherapeutic changes.
Only then will imaging studies have a significant clinical impact.
Post-traumatic recurrent dislocation is a major problem in the operative treatment of shoulder dysfunction in young athletes.
This prospectively designed study evaluates the long-term results of a modified Eden-Hybinette procedure in young male athletes.
The criteria were: capacity in sports, functional limit, and persistent pain.
Genuine disorders of the glenoid or muscular imbalance of the shoulder joint were criteria for exclusion.
Hypertrophic cardiomyopathy is a disorder which primarily affected the myocardium.
It is characterized by a hypertrophic left ventricle that shows normal systolic function but impaired diastolic relaxation.
The most important complication of HCM, sudden cardiac death, is mainly responsible for a mortality of approximately 3.5% in childhood.
While most patients remain asymptomatic for years, there are some reports about patients progressing from hypertrophic cardiomyopathy to a dilative form within years.
A prospective study was performed on 72 patients with osteochondritis dissecans (OD) of the knee and ankle to compare plane radiography, MRI and arthroscopy before therapeutic procedures.
Special interest was placed on the assessment of fragment stability with radiological methods for staging related therapy.
OD was localized in 46 cases on the femoral condyle and in 26 cases on the talus.
Radiological methods were performed simultaneously and shortly before definite arthroscopical therapy.
Using conventional radiography, OD of the condyles was staged according to the classification of Rodegerdts and Gleissner and OD of the talus suggested by Berndt and Harty.
MRI staging was performed by morphology of the interface of the OD.
Arthroscopical staging based on the classification of Guhl.
There was an excellent correlation between the stages in MRI and arthroscopy, showing correct prediction of stable and unstable fragments in 92%.
In contrast, fragment stability could not be efficiently assessed by conventional radiology because fragments could be stably fixed in cases of bony separation.
MRI is indicated before performance of staging-related therapy of OD to select patients with stable fragments for conservative therapy and those with unstable OD for surgical therapy.
A case of rupture of the right hemidiaphragm resulting from blunt trauma with complete intrathoracic dislocation of the right hepatic lobe in a multiple trauma patient is presented.
After a primary chest X-ray study had been interpreted as showing right-sided hemothorax, the thoracic drainage tube was accidentally placed into the liver.
CT revealed a diagnosis of diaphragmatic rupture with intrathoracic liver dislocation.
The liver was replaced and the extended dorsal diaphragmatic rupture was closed primarily via an abdominal approach.
Problems of diagnosis and operative procedure in rare cases of fresh right-sided blunt traumatic diaphragmatic ruptures are discussed.
